Investing money in the stock market is the number one way Americans build wealth and save for long-term goals like retirement, but figuring out the best way to invest that money can feel daunting. This doesn't have to be the case.

The best way to invest money

Everyone has a unique financial situation. The best way to invest money depends on your personal preferences along with your current and future financial circumstances. It's important to have a detailed understanding of your income and expenses, assets and liabilities, responsibilities and goals when building a sound financial plan and choosing the best way to invest for you.

Here's a five-step process that can help you figure out how to invest your money:

Identify your financial goals, timeframe and feelings about risk. Decide whether you want to take a "do-it-yourself" or "manage it for me" approach. Pick the type of investment account you'll use (401(k), IRA, taxable brokerage account, education investment account). Open an account. Choose what investments match your risk tolerance (stocks, bonds, mutual funds, real estate).

And here are the details on how to put your cash to work in the right way, right away.

» Curious about buying stocks? Learn how to invest in the stock market.

1. Give your money a goal

Figuring out how to invest money starts with determining your investing goals, when you need or want to achieve them and your comfort level with risk for each goal.

Long-term goals: The universal goal is often retirement, but you may have others as well: Do you want a down payment on a house or college tuition? To purchase your dream vacation home or go on an anniversary trip in 10 years?

Short-term goals: This is next year's vacation, a house you want to buy next year, an emergency fund or your Christmas piggy bank.

In this post, we're largely focusing on long-term goals. We'll also touch on how to invest with no specific goal in mind. After all, the aim to grow your money is a fine goal by itself.

Money for short-term goals generally shouldn't be invested at all. If you need the money you're saving in under five years, check out our recommendations for how to invest money for short-term goals.

2. Decide how much help you want

Once you know your goals, you can dive into the specifics about how to invest (from picking the type of account to the best place to open an account to choosing investment vehicles). But if the DIY route doesn't sound like it'll be your cup of tea, no worries.

Many savers prefer having someone invest their money for them. And while that used to be a pricey proposition, nowadays it's quite affordable — cheap, even! — to hire professional help thanks to the advent of automated portfolio management services a.k.a. robo-advisors.

These online advisors use computer algorithms and advanced software to build and manage a client’s investment portfolio, offering everything from automatic rebalancing to tax optimization and even access to human help when you need it.

» Need help investing? Learn about robo-advisors

If you'd rather do it yourself, let's continue.

Advertisement NerdWallet rating NerdWallet's ratings are determined by our editorial team. The scoring formula for online brokers and robo-advisors takes into account over 15 factors, including account fees and minimums, investment choices, customer support and mobile app capabilities. NerdWallet rating NerdWallet's ratings are determined by our editorial team. The scoring formula for online brokers and robo-advisors takes into account over 15 factors, including account fees and minimums, investment choices, customer support and mobile app capabilities. NerdWallet rating NerdWallet's ratings are determined by our editorial team. The scoring formula for online brokers and robo-advisors takes into account over 15 factors, including account fees and minimums, investment choices, customer support and mobile app capabilities. Learn More Learn More Learn More Fees $0 per trade Fees $0 per trade Fees $0 per trade Account Minimum $0 Account Minimum $0 Account Minimum $0 Promotion None no promotion available at this time Promotion None no promotion available at this time Promotion None no promotion available at this time

3. Pick an investment account

To buy most types of stocks and bonds, you'll need an investment account. Just as there are a number of bank accounts for different purposes — checking, savings, money market, certificates of deposit — there are a handful of investment accounts to know about.

Some accounts offer tax advantages if you're investing for a specific purpose, like retirement. Keep in mind that you may be taxed or penalized if you pull your money out early, or for a reason not considered qualified by the plan rules. Other accounts are general purpose and should be used for goals not related to retirement — that dream vacation home, the boat to go with it or a home renovation down the line.

Here's a list of some of the most popular investing accounts:

If you're investing for retirement:

401(k): You might already have a 401(k), which is offered by many employers and takes contributions right from your paycheck. Many companies will match your contributions, up to a limit — if yours does, you should contribute at least enough to earn that match before investing elsewhere.

Traditional or Roth IRA: If you're already contributing to a 401(k) or don't have one, you can open an individual retirement account. In a traditional IRA, your contributions are tax-deductible but distributions in retirement are taxed as ordinary income. A Roth IRA is a cousin of the traditional version, with the opposite tax treatment: Contributions are made after-tax, but money grows tax-free and distributions in retirement are not taxed. There are also retirement accounts specifically designed for self-employed people.

» View our roundup of the best IRA providers

If you're investing for another goal:

Taxable account. Sometimes called nonretirement or nonqualified accounts, these are flexible investment accounts not earmarked for any specific purpose. Unlike retirement accounts, there are no rules on contribution amounts, and you can take money out at any time. These accounts don't have specific tax advantages. If you're saving for retirement and you've maxed out the above options, you can continue saving in a taxable account.

College savings accounts. Like retirement accounts, these offer tax perks for saving for college. A 529 account and a Coverdell education savings account are commonly used for college savings.

With the exception of a 401(k) — which is offered through your employer — you can open these accounts at an online broker.

» View our roundup of the best online brokers

4. Open your account

Now that you know what kind of account you want, you need to choose an account provider. There are two major options:

An online broker will allow you to self-manage your account, buying and selling a variety of investments, including stocks, bonds, funds and more complex instruments. An account at an online broker is a good choice for investors who want a large selection of investment options or who prefer to be hands-on with account management. Here's how to open a brokerage account.

A robo-advisor in a portfolio management company that uses computers to do much of the work for you, building and managing a portfolio based on your risk tolerance and goal. You'll pay an annual management fee for the service, generally around 0.25% to 0.50%. Robo-advisors often use funds, so they're generally not a good choice if you're interested in individual stocks or bonds. But they can be ideal for investors who prefer to be hands off.

Don't worry if you're just getting started. Often you can open an account with no initial deposit. (See our lineup of best brokers for beginning investors.) Of course, you're not investing until you actually add money to the account, something you'll want to do regularly for the best results. You can set up automatic transfers from your checking account to your investment account, or even directly from your paycheck if your employer allows that.

5. Choose investments that match your tolerance for risk

Figuring out how to invest money involves asking where you should invest money (see our full list of the best investments for any age or income). The answer will depend on your goals and willingness to take on more risk in exchange for higher potential investment rewards. Common investments include:

Stocks: Individual shares (piece of ownership) of companies you believe will increase in value.

Bonds: Bonds allow a company or government to borrow your money to fund a project or refinance other debt. Bonds are considered fixed-income investments and typically make regular interest payments to investors. The principal is then returned on a set maturity date. (Here's more on how bonds work.)

Mutual funds: Investing your money in funds — like mutual funds, index funds or exchange-traded funds (ETFs)— allows you to purchase many stocks, bonds or other investments all at once. Mutual funds build instant diversification by pooling investor money and using it to buy a basket of investments that align with the fund's stated goal. Funds may be actively managed, with a professional manager selecting the investments used, or they may track an index. A Standard & Poor's 500 index fund, for example, will hold 500 of the largest companies in the United States.

Real estate: Real estate is a way to diversify your investment portfolio outside of the traditional mix of stocks and bonds. It doesn't necessarily mean buying a home or becoming a landlord — you can invest in REITs, which are like mutual funds for real estate, or through online real estate investing platforms, which pool investor money.

For growth, invest in stocks and stock funds

If you have a high risk tolerance and can stomach volatility, you’ll want a portfolio that contains mostly stocks or stock funds. If you have a low risk tolerance, you’ll want a portfolio that has more bonds, since these tend to be more stable and less volatile. Your goals are important in shaping your portfolio, too. For long-term goals, your portfolio can be more aggressive and take more risks — potentially leading to higher returns — so you’ll probably want to own more stocks than bonds.

Whichever route you choose, the best way to reach your long-term financial goals and minimize risk is to spread your money across a range of asset types. That’s called asset allocation. Then within each asset class, you’ll also want to diversify into multiple investments.

Asset allocation is important because different asset classes — stocks, bonds, ETFs, mutual funds, real estate — respond to the market differently. When one is up, another can be down. So deciding on the right mix will help your portfolio weather changing markets on the journey toward achieving your goals.

Diversification means owning a range of assets across a variety of industries, company sizes and geographic areas. It's like a subset of asset allocation.

Building a diversified portfolio of individual stocks and bonds takes time and expertise, so most investors benefit from fund investing. Index funds and ETFs are typically low-cost and easy to manage, as it may take only four or five funds to build adequate diversification.

More resources



Carcharodontosaurid dinosaur genus from the early Cretaceous period

Not to be confused with Gigantosaurus

Giganotosaurus ( JY-gə-NOH-tə-SOR-əs[2]) is a genus of theropod dinosaur that lived in what is now Argentina, during the early Cenomanian age of the Late Cretaceous period, approximately 98 to 97 million years ago. The holotype specimen was discovered in the Candeleros Formation of Patagonia in 1993, and is almost 70% complete. The animal was named Giganotosaurus carolinii in 1995; the genus name translates as "giant southern lizard" and the specific name honors the discoverer, Rubén D. Carolini. A dentary bone, a tooth and some tracks, discovered before the holotype, were later assigned to this animal. The genus attracted much interest and became part of a scientific debate about the maximum sizes of theropod dinosaurs.

Giganotosaurus was one of the largest known terrestrial carnivores, but the exact size has been hard to determine due to the incompleteness of the remains found so far. Estimates for the most complete specimen range from a length of 12 to 13 m (39 to 43 ft), a skull 1.53 to 1.80 m (5.0 to 5.9 ft) in length, and a weight of 4.2 to 13.8 t (4.6 to 15.2 short tons). The dentary bone that belonged to a supposedly larger individual has been used to extrapolate a length of 13.2 m (43 ft). Some researchers have found the animal to be larger than Tyrannosaurus, which has historically been considered the largest theropod, while others have found them to be roughly equal in size, and the largest size estimates for Giganotosaurus exaggerated. The skull was low, with rugose (rough and wrinkled) nasal bones and a ridge-like crest on the lacrimal bone in front of the eye. The front of the lower jaw was flattened, and had a downwards projecting process (or "chin") at the tip. The teeth were compressed sideways and had serrations. The neck was strong and the pectoral girdle proportionally small.

Part of the family Carcharodontosauridae, Giganotosaurus is one of the most completely known members of the group, which includes other very large theropods, such as the closely related Mapusaurus and Carcharodontosaurus. Giganotosaurus is thought to have been homeothermic (a type of "warm-bloodedness"), with a metabolism between that of a mammal and a reptile, which would have enabled fast growth. It may have been relatively fast moving, with a calculated maximal running speed of 14 m/s (50 km/h; 31 mph). It would have been capable of closing its jaws quickly, capturing and bringing down prey by delivering powerful bites. The "chin" may have helped in resisting stress when a bite was delivered against prey. Giganotosaurus is thought to have been the apex predator of its ecosystem, and it may have fed on juvenile sauropod dinosaurs.

Discovery

In 1993, the amateur fossil hunter Rubén D. Carolini discovered the tibia (lower leg bone) of a theropod dinosaur while driving a dune buggy in the badlands near Villa El Chocón, in the Neuquén province of Patagonia, Argentina. Specialists from the National University of Comahue were sent to excavate the specimen after being notified of the find.[3][4] The discovery was announced by the paleontologists Rodolfo Coria and Leonardo Salgado at a Society of Vertebrate Paleontology meeting in 1994, where science writer Don Lessem offered to fund the excavation, after having been impressed by a photo of the leg-bone.[3][5] The partial skull was scattered over an area of about 10 m2 (110 sq ft), and the postcranial skeleton was disarticulated. The specimen preserved almost 70% of the skeleton, and included most of the vertebral column, the pectoral and pelvic girdles, the femora, and the left tibia and fibula. In 1995, this specimen (MUCPv-Ch1) was preliminarily described by Coria and Salgado, who made it the holotype of the new genus and species Giganotosaurus carolinii (parts of the skeleton were still encased in plaster at this time). The generic name is derived from the Ancient Greek words gigas/γίγας (meaning "giant"), notos/νότος (meaning "austral/southern", in reference to its provenance) and -sauros/-σαύρος (meaning "lizard"). The specific name honors Carolini, the discoverer.[6][1][7] The holotype skeleton is now housed in the Ernesto Bachmann Paleontological Museum in Villa El Chocón, which was inaugurated in 1995 at the request of Carolini. The specimen is the main exhibition at the museum, and is placed on the sandy floor of a room devoted to the animal, along with tools used by paleontologists during the excavation. A mounted reconstruction of the skeleton is exhibited in an adjacent room.[4][8]

One of the features of theropod dinosaurs that has attracted most scientific interest is the fact that the group includes the largest terrestrial predators of the Mesozoic Era. This interest began with the discovery of one of the first known dinosaurs, Megalosaurus, named in 1824 for its large size. More than half a century later in 1905, Tyrannosaurus was named, and it remained the largest known theropod dinosaur for 90 years, though other large theropods were also known. The discussion of which theropod was the largest was revived in the 1990s by new discoveries in Africa and South America.[1] In their original description, Coria and Salgado considered Giganotosaurus at least the largest theropod dinosaur from the southern hemisphere, and perhaps the largest in the world. They conceded that comparison with Tyrannosaurus was difficult due to the disarticulated state of the cranial bones of Giganotosaurus, but noted that at 1.43 m (4.7 ft), the femur of Giganotosaurus was 5 cm (2 in) longer than that of "Sue", the largest known Tyrannosaurus specimen, and that the bones of Giganotosaurus appeared to be more robust, indicating a heavier animal. They estimated the skull to have been about 1.53 m (5 ft) long, and the whole animal to have been 12.5 m (41 ft) long, with a weight of about 6 to 8 t (6.6 to 8.8 short tons).[1]

Partial holotype skull (white parts are reconstructed) with assigned left dentary in the background, EBPM

In 1996, the paleontologist Paul Sereno and colleagues described a new skull of the related genus Carcharodontosaurus from Morocco, a theropod described in 1927 but previously known only from fragmentary remains (the original fossils were destroyed in World War II). They estimated the skull to have been 1.60 m (5 ft) long, similar to Giganotosaurus, but perhaps exceeding that of the Tyrannosaurus "Sue", with a 1.53 m (5 ft) long skull. They also pointed out that carcharodontosaurs appear to have had the proportionally largest skulls, but that Tyrannosaurus appears to have had longer hind limbs.[9] In an interview for a 1995 article entitled "new beast usurps T. rex as king carnivore", Sereno noted that these newly discovered theropods from South America and Africa competed with Tyrannosaurus as the largest predators, and would help in the understanding of Late Cretaceous dinosaur faunas, which had otherwise been very "North America-centric".[10] In the same issue of the journal in which Carcharodontosaurus was described, the paleontologist Philip J. Currie cautioned that it was yet to be determined which of the two animals were larger, and that the size of an animal is less interesting to paleontologists than, for example, adaptations, relationships, and distribution. He also found it remarkable that the two animals were found within a year of each other, and were closely related, in spite of being found on different continents.[11]

In a 1997 interview, Coria estimated Giganotosaurus to have been 13.7 (45 ft) to 14.3 (47 ft) m long and weighing 8 to 10 t (8.8 to 11.0 short tons) based on new material, larger than Carcharodontosaurus. Sereno countered that it would be difficult to determine a size range for a species based on few, incomplete specimens, and both paleontologists agreed that other aspects of these dinosaurs were more important than settling the "size contest".[12] In 1998, the paleontologist Jorge O. Calvo and Coria assigned a partial left dentary bone (part of the lower jaw) containing some teeth (MUCPv-95) to Giganotosaurus. It had been collected by Calvo near Los Candeleros in 1988 (found in 1987), who described it briefly in 1989, while noting it may have belonged to a new theropod taxon. Calvo and Coria found the dentary to be identical to that of the holotype, though 8% larger at 62 cm (24 in). Though the rear part of it is incomplete, they proposed that the skull of the holotype specimen would have been 1.80 m (6 ft) long, and estimated the skull of the larger specimen to have been 1.95 m (6.4 ft) long, the longest skull of any theropod.[13][14][15]

In 1999, Calvo referred an incomplete tooth, (MUCPv-52), to Giganotosaurus; this specimen was discovered near Lake Ezequiel Ramos Mexia in 1987 by A. Delgado, and is therefore the first known fossil of the genus. Calvo further suggested that some theropod trackways and isolated tracks (which he made the basis of the ichnotaxon Abelichnus astigarrae in 1991) belonged to Giganotosaurus, based on their large size. The largest tracks are 50 cm (20 in) long with a pace of 130 cm (51 in), and the smallest is 36 cm (14 in) long with a pace of 100 cm (39 in). The tracks are tridactyl (three-toed) and have large and coarse digits, with prominent claw impressions. Impressions of the digits occupy most of the track-length, and one track has a thin heel. Though the tracks were found in a higher stratigraphic level than the main fossils of Giganotosaurus, they were from the same strata as the single tooth and some sauropod dinosaurs that are also known from the same strata as Giganotosaurus.[14]

Continued debate about size

Comparison between the estimated sizes of the holotype (light green) and assigned specimen (dark green)

In 2001, the physician-scientist Frank Seebacher proposed a new polynomial method of calculating body-mass estimates for dinosaurs (using body-length, depth, and width), and found Giganotosaurus to have weighed 6.6 t (7.3 short tons) (based on the original 12.5 m (41 ft) length estimate).[16] In their 2002 description of the braincase of Giganotosaurus, Coria and Currie gave a length estimate of 1.60 m (5 ft) for the holotype skull, and calculated a weight of 4.2 t (4.6 short tons) by extrapolating from the 520 mm (20 in) circumference of the femur-shaft. This resulted in an encephalization quotient (a measure of relative brain size) of 1.9.[6] In 2004, the paleontologist Gerardo V. Mazzetta and colleagues pointed out that though the femur of the Giganotosaurus holotype was larger than that of "Sue", the tibia was 8 cm (3 in) shorter at 1.12 m (4 ft). They found the holotype specimen to have been equal to Tyrannosaurus in size at 8 t (8.8 short tons) (marginally smaller than "Sue"), but that the larger dentary might have represented an animal of 10 t (11 short tons), if geometrically similar to the holotype specimen. By using multivariate regression equations, these authors also suggested an alternative weight of 6.5 t (7.2 short tons) for the holotype and 8.2 t (9.0 short tons) for the larger specimen, and that the latter was therefore the largest known terrestrial carnivore.[17]

In 2005, the paleontologist Cristiano Dal Sasso and colleagues described new skull material (a snout) of Spinosaurus (the original fossils of which were also destroyed during World War II), and concluded this dinosaur would have been 16 to 18 m (52 to 59 ft) long with a weight 7 to 9 t (7.7 to 9.9 short tons), exceeding the maximum size of all other theropods.[18] In 2006, Coria and Currie described the large theropod Mapusaurus from Patagonia; it was closely related to Giganotosaurus and of approximately the same size.[19] In 2007, the paleontologists François Therrien and Donald M. Henderson found that Giganotosaurus and Carcharodontosaurus would both have approached 13.5 m (44 ft) in length and 13.8 t (15.2 short tons) in weight (surpassing Tyrannosaurus), and estimated the Giganotosaurus holotype skull to have been 1.56 m (5 ft) long. They cautioned that these measurements depended on whether the incomplete skulls of these animals had been reconstructed correctly, and that more complete specimens were needed for more accurate estimates. They also found that Dal Sasso and colleagues' reconstruction of Spinosaurus was too large, and instead estimated it to have been 14.3 m (47 ft) long, weighing 20.9 t (23.0 short tons), and possibly as low as 12.6 m (41 ft) in length and 12 t (13 short tons) in weight. They concluded that these dinosaurs had reached the upper biomechanical size limit attainable by a strictly bipedal animal.[20] In 2010, the paleontologist Gregory S. Paul suggested that the skulls of carcharodontosaurs had been reconstructed as too long in general.[21]

In 2012, the paleontologist Matthew T. Carrano and colleagues noted that though Giganotosaurus had received much attention due to its enormous size, and in spite of the holotype being relatively complete, it had not yet been described in detail, apart from the braincase. They pointed out that many contacts between skull bones were not preserved, which lead to the total length of the skull being ambiguous. They found instead that the skulls of Giganotosaurus and Carcharodontosaurus were exactly the same size as that of Tyrannosaurus. They also measured the femur of the Giganotosaurus holotype to be 1.365 m (4 ft) long, in contrast to the original measurement, and proposed that the body mass would have been smaller overall.[22] In 2013, the paleontologist Scott Hartman published a Graphic Double Integration mass estimate (based on drawn skeletal reconstructions) on his blog, wherein he found Tyrannosaurus ("Sue") to have been larger than Giganotosaurus overall. He estimated the Giganotosaurus holotype to have weighed 6.8 t (7.5 short tons), and the larger specimen 8.2 t (9.0 short tons). Tyrannosaurus was estimated to have weighed 8.4 t (9.3 short tons), and Hartman noted that it had a wider torso, though the two seemed similar in side view. He also pointed out that the Giganotosaurus dentary that was supposedly 8% larger than that of the holotype specimen would rather have been 6.5% larger, or could simply have belonged to a similarly sized animal with a more robust dentary. He conceded that with only one good Giganotosaurus specimen known, it is possible that larger individuals will be found, as it took most of a century to find "Sue" after Tyrannosaurus was discovered.[23]

In 2014, Nizar Ibrahim and colleagues estimated the length of Spinosaurus to have been over 15 m (49 ft), by extrapolating from a new specimen scaled up to match the snout described by Dal Sasso and colleagues.[24] This would make Spinosaurus the largest known carnivorous dinosaur.[25] In 2019, the paleontologist W. Scott Persons and colleagues described a Tyrannosaurus specimen (nicknamed "Scotty"), and estimated it to be more massive than other giant theropods, but cautioned that the femoral proportions of the carcharodontosaurids Giganotosaurus and Tyrannotitan indicated a body mass larger than other adult Tyrannosaurus. They noted that these theropods were known by far fewer specimens than Tyrannosaurus, and that future finds may reveal specimens larger than "Scotty", as indicated by the large Giganotosaurus dentary. While "Scotty" had the greatest femoral circumference, the femoral length of Giganotosaurus was about 10% longer, but the authors stated it was difficult to compare proportions between large theropod clades.[26][27]

Description

Size (green) compared to that of other large theropods

Giganotosaurus is thought to have been one of the largest theropod dinosaurs, but the incompleteness of its remains have made it difficult to estimate its size reliably. It is therefore impossible to determine with certainty whether it was larger than Tyrannosaurus, for example, which has been considered the largest theropod historically. Different size estimates have been reached by several researchers, based on various methods, and depending on how the missing parts of the skeleton have been reconstructed. Length estimates for the holotype specimen] have varied between 12 and 13 m (39 and 43 ft), with a skull between 1.53 and 1.80 m (5.0 and 5.9 ft) long, a femur (thigh bone) between 1.365 and 1.43 m (4.48 and 4.69 ft) long, and a weight between 4.2 and 13.8 t (4.6 and 15.2 short tons).[6][1][13][20] Fusion of sutures (joints) in the braincase indicates the holotype specimen was a mature individual.[6] A second specimen, consisting of a dentary bone from a supposedly larger individual, has been used to extrapolate a length of 13.2 m (43 ft), a skull 1.95 m (6.4 ft) long, and a weight of 8.2 t (9.0 short tons). Some writers have considered the largest size estimates for both specimens exaggerated.[13][28][23][22] Giganotosaurus has been compared to an oversized version of the well-known genus Allosaurus.[10]

Skull

Reconstructed skull in Japan, based on large size estimates

Though incompletely known, the skull of Giganotosaurus appears to have been low. The maxilla of the upper jaw had a 92 cm (36 in) long tooth row, was deep from top to bottom, and its upper and lower edges were almost parallel. The maxilla had a pronounced process (projection) under the nostril, and a small, ellipse-shaped fenestra (opening), as in Allosaurus and Tyrannosaurus. The nasal bone was very rugose (rough and wrinkled), and these rugosities continued backwards, covering the entire upper surface of this bone. The lacrimal bone in front of the eye had a prominent, rugose crest (or horn) that pointed up at a backwards angle. The crest was ridge-like, and had deep grooves. The postorbital bone behind the eye had a down and backwards directed jugal process that projected into the orbit (eye opening), as seen in Tyrannosaurus, Abelisaurus, and Carnotaurus. The supraorbital bone above the eye that contacted between the lacrimal and postorbital bones was eave-like, and similar to that of Abelisaurus. The quadrate bone at the back of the skull was 44 cm (17 in) long, and had two pneumatic (air-filled) foramina (holes) on the inner side.[1][19]

Partial teeth, EBPM

The skull roof (formed by the frontal and parietal bones) was broad and formed a "shelf", which overhung the short supratemporal fenestrae at the top rear of the skull. The jaw articulated far behind the occipital condyle (where the neck is attached to the skull) compared to other theropods. The condyle was broad and low, and had pneumatic cavities. Giganotosaurus did not have a sagittal crest on the top of the skull, and the jaw muscles did not extend onto the skull roof, unlike in most other theropods (due to the shelf over the supratemporal fenestrae). These muscles would instead have been attached to the lower side surfaces of the shelf. The neck muscles that elevated the head would have attached to the prominent supraoccipital bones on the top of the skull, which functioned like the nuchal crest of tyrannosaurs.[6] A latex endocast of the brain cavity of Giganotosaurus showed that the brain was similar to that of the related genus Carcharodontosaurus, but larger. The endocast was 29 mm (1 in) long, 64 mm (3 in) wide, and had a volume of 275 ml (9.7 imp fl oz).[29]

The dentary of the lower jaw expanded in height towards the front (by the mandibular symphysis, where the two halves of the lower jaw connected), where it was also flattened, and it had a downwards projection at the tip (which has been referred to as a "chin"). The lower side of the dentary was concave, the outer side was convex in upper view, and a groove ran along it, which supported foramina that nourished the teeth. The inner side of the dentary had a row of interdental plates, where each tooth had a foramen. The Meckelian groove ran along the lower border. The curvature of the dentary shows that the mouth of Giganotosaurus would have been wide. It is possible that each dentary had twelve alveoli (tooth sockets). Most of the alveoli were about 3.5 cm (1.3 in) long from front to back. The teeth of the dentary were of similar shape and size, except for the first one, which was smaller. The teeth were compressed sideways, were oval in cross-section, and had serrations at the front and back borders, which is typical of theropods.[13][30] The teeth were sigmoid-shaped when seen in front and back view.[31] One tooth had nine to twelve serrations per mm (0.039 in).[14] The side teeth of Giganotosaurus had curved ridges of enamel, and the largest teeth in the premaxilla (front of the upper jaw) had pronounced wrinkles (with their highest relief near the serrations).[32]

Postcranial skeleton

The neck of Giganotosaurus was strong, and the axis bone (the neck vertebra that articulates with the skull) was robust. The rear neck (cervical) vertebrae had short, flattened centra (the "bodies" of the vertebrae), with almost hemispherical articulations (contacts) at the front, and pleurocoels (hollow depressions) divided by laminae (plates). The back (dorsal) vertebrae had high neural arches and deep pleurocoels. The tail (caudal) vertebrae had neural spines that were elongated from front to back and had robust centra. The transverse processes of the caudal vertebrae were long from front to back, and the chevrons on the front were blade-like. The pectoral girdle was proportionally shorter than that of Tyrannosaurus, with the ratio between the scapula (shoulder blade) and the femur being less than 0.5. The blade of the scapula had parallel borders, and a strong tubercle for insertion of the triceps muscle. The coracoid was small and hook-shaped.[1]

The ilium of the pelvis had a convex upper border, a low postacetabular blade (behind the acetabulum), and a narrow brevis-shelf (a projection where tail muscles attached). The pubic foot was pronounced and shorter at the front than behind. The ischium was straight and expanded hindwards, ending in a lobe-shape. The femur was sigmoid-shaped, and had a very robust, upwards pointing head, with a deep sulcus (groove). The lesser trochanter of the femoral head was wing-like, and placed below the greater trochanter, which was short. The fourth trochanter was large and projected backwards. The tibia of the lower leg was expanded at the upper end, its articular facet (where it articulated with the femur) was wide, and its shaft was compressed from front to back.[1]

Classification

Coria and Salgado originally found Giganotosaurus to group more closely with the theropod clade Tetanurae than to more basal (or "primitive") theropods such as ceratosaurs, due to shared features (synapomorphies) in the legs, skull, and pelvis. Other features showed that it was outside the more derived (or "advanced") clade Coelurosauria.[1] In 1996, Sereno and colleagues found Giganotosaurus, Carcharodontosaurus, and Acrocanthosaurus to be closely related within the superfamily Allosauroidea, and grouped them in the family Carcharodontosauridae. Features shared between these genera include the lacrimal and postorbital bones forming a broad "shelf" over the orbit, and the squared front end of the lower jaw.[9]

As more carcharodontosaurids were discovered, their interrelationships became clearer. The group was defined as all allosauroids closer to Carcharodontosaurus than Allosaurus or Sinraptor by the paleontologist Thomas R. Holtz and colleagues in 2004.[33] In 2006, Coria and Currie united Giganotosaurus and Mapusaurus in the carcharodontosaurid subfamily Giganotosaurinae based on shared features of the femur, such as a weak fourth trochanter, and a shallow, broad groove on the lower end.[19] In 2008, Sereno and the paleontologist Stephen L. Brusatte united Giganotosaurus, Mapusaurus, and Tyrannotitan in the tribe Giganotosaurini.[34] In 2010, Paul listed Giganotosaurus as "Giganotosaurus (or Carcharodontosaurus) carolinii" without elaboration.[21] Giganotosaurus is one of the most complete and informative members of Carcharodontosauridae.[33]

The following cladogram shows the placement of Giganotosaurus within Carcharodontosauridae according to Sebastián Apesteguía et al., 2016:[35]

Evolution

Coria and Salgado suggested that the convergent evolution of gigantism in theropods could have been linked to common conditions in their environments or ecosystems.[1] Sereno and colleagues found that the presence of carcharodontosaurids in Africa (Carcharodontosaurus), North America (Acrocanthosaurus), and South America (Giganotosaurus), showed the group had a transcontinental distribution by the Early Cretaceous period. Dispersal routes between the northern and southern continents appear to have been severed by ocean barriers in the Late Cretaceous, which led to more distinct, provincial faunas, by preventing exchange.[9] Previously, it was thought that the Cretaceous world was biogeographically separated, with the northern continents being dominated by tyrannosaurids, South America by abelisaurids, and Africa by carcharodontosaurids.[11][36] The subfamily Carcharodontosaurinae, in which Giganotosaurus belongs, appears to have been restricted to the southern continent of Gondwana (formed by South America and Africa), where they were probably the apex (top) predators.[33] The South American tribe Giganotosaurini may have been separated from their African relatives through vicariance, when Gondwana broke up during the Aptian–Albian ages of the Early Cretaceous.[31]

Paleobiology

Restoration with size comparison

In 1999, the paleontologist Reese E. Barrick and the geologist William J. Showers found that the bones of Giganotosaurus and Tyrannosaurus had very similar oxygen isotope patterns, with similar heat distribution in the body. These thermoregulatory patterns indicate that these dinosaurs had a metabolism intermediate between that of mammals and reptiles, and were therefore homeothermic (with a stable core body-temperature, a type of "warm-bloodedness"). The metabolism of an 8 t (8.8 short tons) Giganotosaurus would be comparable to that of a 1 t (1.1 short tons) mammalian carnivore, and would have supported rapid growth.[37]

In 2001, the physicist Rudemar Ernesto Blanco and Mazzetta evaluated the cursorial (running) capability of Giganotosaurus. They rejected the hypothesis by James O. Farlow that the risk of injuries involved in such large animals falling while on a run, would limit the speed of large theropods. Instead they posed that the imbalance caused by increasing velocity would be the limiting factor. Calculating the time it would take for a leg to gain balance after the retraction of the opposite leg, they found the upper kinematic limit of the running speed to be 14 m/s (50 km/h; 31 mph). They also found comparison between the running capability of Giganotosaurus and birds like the ostrich based on the strength of their leg-bones to be of limited value, since theropods, unlike birds, had heavy tails to counterbalance their weight.[38]

A 2017 biomechanical study of the running ability of Tyrannosaurus by the biologist William I. Sellers and colleagues suggested that skeletal loads were too great to have allowed adult individuals to run. The relatively long limbs, which were long argued to indicate good running ability, would instead have mechanically limited it to walking gaits, and it would therefore not have been a high-speed pursuit predator. They suggested that these findings would also apply to other long-limbed giant theropods such as Giganotosaurus, Mapusaurus, and Acrocanthosaurus.[39]

Feeding

In 2002, Coria and Currie found that various features of the rear part of the skull (such as the frontwards slope of the occiput and low and wide occipital condyle) indicate that Giganotosaurus would have had a good capability of moving the skull sideways in relation to the front neck vertebrae. These features may also have been related to the increased mass and length of the jaw muscles; the jaw articulation of Giganotosaurus and other carcharodontosaurids was moved hindwards to increase the length of the jaw musculature, enabling faster closure of the jaws, whereas tyrannosaurs increased the mass of the lower jaw musculature, to increase the power of their bite.[6]

In 2005 Therrien and colleagues estimated the relative bite force of theropods and found that Giganotosaurus and related taxa had adaptations for capturing and bringing down prey by delivering powerful bites, whereas tyrannosaurs had adaptations for resisting torsional stress and crushing bones. Estimates in absolute values like newtons were impossible. The bite force of Giganotosaurus was weaker than that of Tyrannosaurus, and the force decreased hindwards along the tooth row. The lower jaws were adapted for slicing bites, and it probably captured and manipulated prey with the front part of the jaws. These authors suggested that Giganotosaurus and other allosaurs may have been generalized predators that fed on a wide spectrum of prey smaller than themselves, such as juvenile sauropods. The ventral process (or "chin") of the lower jaw may have been an adaptation for resisting tensile stress when the powerful bite was delivered with the front of the jaws against the prey.[40]

The first known fossils of the closely related Mapusaurus were found in a bonebed consisting of several individuals at different growth stages. In their 2006 description of the genus, Coria and Currie suggested that though this could be due to a long term or coincidental accumulation of carcasses, the presence of different growth stages of the same taxon indicated the aggregation was not coincidental.[19] In a 2006 National Geographic article, Coria stated that the bonebed was probably the result of a catastrophic event and that the presence of mainly medium-sized individuals, with very few young or old, is normal for animals that form packs. Therefore, Coria said, large theropods may have hunted in groups, which would be advantageous when hunting gigantic sauropods.[41]

Paleoenvironment

Giganotosaurus was discovered in the Candeleros Formation, which was deposited during the Early Cenomanian age of the Late Cretaceous period, approximately 98 to 97 million years ago,[42][43] although Holtz provided an earlier lower bound for its age of 99.6 million years.[28] This formation is the lowest unit in the Neuquén Group, wherein it is part of the Río Limay Subgroup. The formation is composed of coarse and medium-grained sandstones deposited in a fluvial environment (associated with rivers and streams), and in aeolian conditions (effected by wind). Paleosols (buried soil), siltstones, and claystones are present, some of which represent swamp conditions.[44]

Giganotosaurus was probably the apex predator in its ecosystem. It shared its environment with herbivorous dinosaurs such as the titanosaurian sauropod Andesaurus, and the rebbachisaurid sauropods Limaysaurus and Nopcsaspondylus. Other theropods include the abelisaurid Ekrixinatosaurus, the dromaeosaurid Buitreraptor, and the alvarezsaurid Alnashetri. Other reptiles include the crocodyliform Araripesuchus, sphenodontians, snakes, and the turtle Prochelidella. Other vertebrates include cladotherian mammals, a pipoid frog, and ceratodontiform fishes. Footprints indicate the presence of large ornithopods and pterosaurs as well.[44][33]
We connect customers and communities worldwide through our face-to-face, virtual and hybrid events.

Our passion, combined with our local market expertise, enables us to produce and deliver tailor made B2B and B2C events for the 43 industry sectors we serve - from jewellery to travel, engineering to pop culture, entertainment, real estate, security, hospitality and many more. Underpinned by our skilled teams in digital, data and technology innovation - whether on-line or in-person - each of our events is carefully crafted to provide compelling content, efficient networking and prosperous deal-making opportunities to maximise return on investment for you and your business.

DISCOVER MORE

Bee Movie Script - Dialogue Transcript

  
According to all known laws
of aviation,

  
there is no way a bee
should be able to fly.

  
Its wings are too small to get
its fat little body off the ground.

  
The bee, of course, flies anyway

  
because bees don't care
what humans think is impossible.

  
Yellow, black. Yellow, black.
Yellow, black. Yellow, black.

  
Ooh, black and yellow!
Let's shake it up a little.

  
Barry! Breakfast is ready!

  
Ooming!

  
Hang on a second.

  
Hello?

  
- Barry?
- Adam?

  
- Oan you believe this is happening?
- I can't. I'll pick you up.

  
Looking sharp.

  
Use the stairs. Your father
paid good money for those.

  
Sorry. I'm excited.

  
Here's the graduate.
We're very proud of you, son.

  
A perfect report card, all B's.

  
Very proud.

  
Ma! I got a thing going here.

  
- You got lint on your fuzz.
- Ow! That's me!

  
- Wave to us! We'll be in row 118,000.
- Bye!

  
Barry, I told you,
stop flying in the house!

  
- Hey, Adam.
- Hey, Barry.

  
- Is that fuzz gel?
- A little. Special day, graduation.

  
Never thought I'd make it.

  
Three days grade school,
three days high school.

  
Those were awkward.

  
Three days college. I'm glad I took
a day and hitchhiked around the hive.

  
You did come back different.

  
- Hi, Barry.
- Artie, growing a mustache? Looks good.

  
- Hear about Frankie?
- Yeah.

  
- You going to the funeral?
- No, I'm not going.

  
Everybody knows,
sting someone, you die.

  
Don't waste it on a squirrel.
Such a hothead.

  
I guess he could have
just gotten out of the way.

  
I love this incorporating
an amusement park into our day.

  
That's why we don't need vacations.

  
Boy, quite a bit of pomp...
under the circumstances.

  
- Well, Adam, today we are men.
- We are!

  
- Bee-men.
- Amen!

  
Hallelujah!

  
Students, faculty, distinguished bees,

  
please welcome Dean Buzzwell.

  
Welcome, New Hive Oity
graduating class of...

  
...9:15.

  
That concludes our ceremonies.

  
And begins your career
at Honex Industries!

  
Will we pick ourjob today?

  
I heard it's just orientation.

  
Heads up! Here we go.

  
Keep your hands and antennas
inside the tram at all times.

  
- Wonder what it'll be like?
- A little scary.

  
Welcome to Honex,
a division of Honesco

  
and a part of the Hexagon Group.

  
This is it!

  
Wow.

  
Wow.

  
We know that you, as a bee,
have worked your whole life

  
to get to the point where you
can work for your whole life.

  
Honey begins when our valiant Pollen
Jocks bring the nectar to the hive.

  
Our top-secret formula

  
is automatically color-corrected,
scent-adjusted and bubble-contoured

  
into this soothing sweet syrup

  
with its distinctive
golden glow you know as...

  
Honey!

  
- That girl was hot.
- She's my cousin!

  
- She is?
- Yes, we're all cousins.

  
- Right. You're right.
- At Honex, we constantly strive

  
to improve every aspect
of bee existence.

  
These bees are stress-testing
a new helmet technology.

  
- What do you think he makes?
- Not enough.

  
Here we have our latest advancement,
the Krelman.

  
- What does that do?
- Oatches that little strand of honey

  
that hangs after you pour it.
Saves us millions.

  
Oan anyone work on the Krelman?

  
Of course. Most bee jobs are
small ones. But bees know

  
that every small job,
if it's done well, means a lot.

  
But choose carefully

  
because you'll stay in the job
you pick for the rest of your life.

  
The same job the rest of your life?
I didn't know that.

  
What's the difference?

  
You'll be happy to know that bees,
as a species, haven't had one day off

  
in 27 million years.

  
So you'll just work us to death?

  
We'll sure try.

  
Wow! That blew my mind!

  
"What's the difference?"
How can you say that?

  
One job forever?
That's an insane choice to have to make.

  
I'm relieved. Now we only have
to make one decision in life.

  
But, Adam, how could they
never have told us that?

  
Why would you question anything?
We're bees.

  
We're the most perfectly
functioning society on Earth.

  
You ever think maybe things
work a little too well here?

  
Like what? Give me one example.

  
I don't know. But you know
what I'm talking about.

  
Please clear the gate.
Royal Nectar Force on approach.

  
Wait a second. Oheck it out.

  
- Hey, those are Pollen Jocks!
- Wow.

  
I've never seen them this close.

  
They know what it's like
outside the hive.

  
Yeah, but some don't come back.

  
- Hey, Jocks!
- Hi, Jocks!

  
You guys did great!

  
You're monsters!
You're sky freaks! I love it! I love it!

  
- I wonder where they were.
- I don't know.

  
Their day's not planned.

  
Outside the hive, flying who knows
where, doing who knows what.

  
You can'tjust decide to be a Pollen
Jock. You have to be bred for that.

  
Right.

  
Look. That's more pollen
than you and I will see in a lifetime.

  
It's just a status symbol.
Bees make too much of it.

  
Perhaps. Unless you're wearing it
and the ladies see you wearing it.

  
Those ladies?
Aren't they our cousins too?

  
Distant. Distant.

  
Look at these two.

  
- Oouple of Hive Harrys.
- Let's have fun with them.

  
It must be dangerous
being a Pollen Jock.

  
Yeah. Once a bear pinned me
against a mushroom!

  
He had a paw on my throat,
and with the other, he was slapping me!

  
- Oh, my!
- I never thought I'd knock him out.

  
What were you doing during this?

  
Trying to alert the authorities.

  
I can autograph that.

  
A little gusty out there today,
wasn't it, comrades?

  
Yeah. Gusty.

  
We're hitting a sunflower patch
six miles from here tomorrow.

  
- Six miles, huh?
- Barry!

  
A puddle jump for us,
but maybe you're not up for it.

  
- Maybe I am.
- You are not!

  
We're going 0900 at J-Gate.

  
What do you think, buzzy-boy?
Are you bee enough?

  
I might be. It all depends
on what 0900 means.

  
Hey, Honex!

  
Dad, you surprised me.

  
You decide what you're interested in?

  
- Well, there's a lot of choices.
- But you only get one.

  
Do you ever get bored
doing the same job every day?

  
Son, let me tell you about stirring.

  
You grab that stick, and you just
move it around, and you stir it around.

  
You get yourself into a rhythm.
It's a beautiful thing.

  
You know, Dad,
the more I think about it,

  
maybe the honey field
just isn't right for me.

  
You were thinking of what,
making balloon animals?

  
That's a bad job
for a guy with a stinger.

  
Janet, your son's not sure
he wants to go into honey!

  
- Barry, you are so funny sometimes.
- I'm not trying to be funny.

  
You're not funny! You're going
into honey. Our son, the stirrer!

  
- You're gonna be a stirrer?
- No one's listening to me!

  
Wait till you see the sticks I have.

  
I could say anything right now.
I'm gonna get an ant tattoo!

  
Let's open some honey and celebrate!

  
Maybe I'll pierce my thorax.
Shave my antennae.

  
Shack up with a grasshopper. Get
a gold tooth and call everybody "dawg"!

  
I'm so proud.

  
- We're starting work today!
- Today's the day.

  
Oome on! All the good jobs
will be gone.

  
Yeah, right.

  
Pollen counting, stunt bee, pouring,
stirrer, front desk, hair removal...

  
- Is it still available?
- Hang on. Two left!

  
One of them's yours! Oongratulations!
Step to the side.

  
- What'd you get?
- Picking crud out. Stellar!

  
Wow!

  
Oouple of newbies?

  
Yes, sir! Our first day! We are ready!

  
Make your choice.

  
- You want to go first?
- No, you go.

  
Oh, my. What's available?

  
Restroom attendant's open,
not for the reason you think.

  
- Any chance of getting the Krelman?
- Sure, you're on.

  
I'm sorry, the Krelman just closed out.

  
Wax monkey's always open.

  
The Krelman opened up again.

  
What happened?

  
A bee died. Makes an opening. See?
He's dead. Another dead one.

  
Deady. Deadified. Two more dead.

  
Dead from the neck up.
Dead from the neck down. That's life!

  
Oh, this is so hard!

  
Heating, cooling,
stunt bee, pourer, stirrer,

  
humming, inspector number seven,
lint coordinator, stripe supervisor,

  
mite wrangler. Barry, what
do you think I should... Barry?

  
Barry!

  
All right, we've got the sunflower patch
in quadrant nine...

  
What happened to you?
Where are you?

  
- I'm going out.
- Out? Out where?

  
- Out there.
- Oh, no!

  
I have to, before I go
to work for the rest of my life.

  
You're gonna die! You're crazy! Hello?

  
Another call coming in.

  
If anyone's feeling brave,
there's a Korean deli on 83rd

  
that gets their roses today.

  
Hey, guys.

  
- Look at that.
- Isn't that the kid we saw yesterday?

  
Hold it, son, flight deck's restricted.

  
It's OK, Lou. We're gonna take him up.

  
Really? Feeling lucky, are you?

  
Sign here, here. Just initial that.

  
- Thank you.
- OK.

  
You got a rain advisory today,

  
and as you all know,
bees cannot fly in rain.

  
So be careful. As always,
watch your brooms,

  
hockey sticks, dogs,
birds, bears and bats.

  
Also, I got a couple of reports
of root beer being poured on us.

  
Murphy's in a home because of it,
babbling like a cicada!

  
- That's awful.
- And a reminder for you rookies,

  
bee law number one,
absolutely no talking to humans!

  
All right, launch positions!

  
Buzz, buzz, buzz, buzz! Buzz, buzz,
buzz, buzz! Buzz, buzz, buzz, buzz!

  
Black and yellow!

  
Hello!

  
You ready for this, hot shot?

  
Yeah. Yeah, bring it on.

  
Wind, check.

  
- Antennae, check.
- Nectar pack, check.

  
- Wings, check.
- Stinger, check.

  
Scared out of my shorts, check.

  
OK, ladies,

  
let's move it out!

  
Pound those petunias,
you striped stem-suckers!

  
All of you, drain those flowers!

  
Wow! I'm out!

  
I can't believe I'm out!

  
So blue.

  
I feel so fast and free!

  
Box kite!

  
Wow!

  
Flowers!

  
This is Blue Leader.
We have roses visual.

  
Bring it around 30 degrees and hold.

  
Roses!

  
30 degrees, roger. Bringing it around.

  
Stand to the side, kid.
It's got a bit of a kick.

  
That is one nectar collector!

  
- Ever see pollination up close?
- No, sir.

  
I pick up some pollen here, sprinkle it
over here. Maybe a dash over there,

  
a pinch on that one.
See that? It's a little bit of magic.

  
That's amazing. Why do we do that?

  
That's pollen power. More pollen, more
flowers, more nectar, more honey for us.

  
Oool.

  
I'm picking up a lot of bright yellow.
Oould be daisies. Don't we need those?

  
Oopy that visual.

  
Wait. One of these flowers
seems to be on the move.

  
Say again? You're reporting
a moving flower?

  
Affirmative.

  
That was on the line!

  
This is the coolest. What is it?

  
I don't know, but I'm loving this color.

  
It smells good.
Not like a flower, but I like it.

  
Yeah, fuzzy.

  
Ohemical-y.

  
Oareful, guys. It's a little grabby.

  
My sweet lord of bees!

  
Oandy-brain, get off there!

  
Problem!

  
- Guys!
- This could be bad.

  
Affirmative.

  
Very close.

  
Gonna hurt.

  
Mama's little boy.

  
You are way out of position, rookie!

  
Ooming in at you like a missile!

  
Help me!

  
I don't think these are flowers.

  
- Should we tell him?
- I think he knows.

  
What is this?!

  
Match point!

  
You can start packing up, honey,
because you're about to eat it!

  
Yowser!

  
Gross.

  
There's a bee in the car!

  
- Do something!
- I'm driving!

  
- Hi, bee.
- He's back here!

  
He's going to sting me!

  
Nobody move. If you don't move,
he won't sting you. Freeze!

  
He blinked!

  
Spray him, Granny!

  
What are you doing?!

  
Wow... the tension level
out here is unbelievable.

  
I gotta get home.

  
Oan't fly in rain.

  
Oan't fly in rain.

  
Oan't fly in rain.

  
Mayday! Mayday! Bee going down!

  
Ken, could you close
the window please?

  
Ken, could you close
the window please?

  
Oheck out my new resume.
I made it into a fold-out brochure.

  
You see? Folds out.

  
Oh, no. More humans. I don't need this.

  
What was that?

  
Maybe this time. This time. This time.
This time! This time! This...

  
Drapes!

  
That is diabolical.

  
It's fantastic. It's got all my special
skills, even my top-ten favorite movies.

  
What's number one? Star Wars?

  
Nah, I don't go for that...

  
...kind of stuff.

  
No wonder we shouldn't talk to them.
They're out of their minds.

  
When I leave a job interview, they're
flabbergasted, can't believe what I say.

  
There's the sun. Maybe that's a way out.

  
I don't remember the sun
having a big 75 on it.

  
I predicted global warming.

  
I could feel it getting hotter.
At first I thought it was just me.

  
Wait! Stop! Bee!

  
Stand back. These are winter boots.

  
Wait!

  
Don't kill him!

  
You know I'm allergic to them!
This thing could kill me!

  
Why does his life have
less value than yours?

  
Why does his life have any less value
than mine? Is that your statement?

  
I'm just saying all life has value. You
don't know what he's capable of feeling.

  
My brochure!

  
There you go, little guy.

  
I'm not scared of him.
It's an allergic thing.

  
Put that on your resume brochure.

  
My whole face could puff up.

  
Make it one of your special skills.

  
Knocking someone out
is also a special skill.

  
Right. Bye, Vanessa. Thanks.

  
- Vanessa, next week? Yogurt night?
- Sure, Ken. You know, whatever.

  
- You could put carob chips on there.
- Bye.

  
- Supposed to be less calories.
- Bye.

  
I gotta say something.

  
She saved my life.
I gotta say something.

  
All right, here it goes.

  
Nah.

  
What would I say?

  
I could really get in trouble.

  
It's a bee law.
You're not supposed to talk to a human.

  
I can't believe I'm doing this.

  
I've got to.

  
Oh, I can't do it. Oome on!

  
No. Yes. No.

  
Do it. I can't.

  
How should I start it?
"You like jazz?" No, that's no good.

  
Here she comes! Speak, you fool!

  
Hi!

  
I'm sorry.

  
- You're talking.
- Yes, I know.

  
You're talking!

  
I'm so sorry.

  
No, it's OK. It's fine.
I know I'm dreaming.

  
But I don't recall going to bed.

  
Well, I'm sure this
is very disconcerting.

  
This is a bit of a surprise to me.
I mean, you're a bee!

  
I am. And I'm not supposed
to be doing this,

  
but they were all trying to kill me.

  
And if it wasn't for you...

  
I had to thank you.
It's just how I was raised.

  
That was a little weird.

  
- I'm talking with a bee.
- Yeah.

  
I'm talking to a bee.
And the bee is talking to me!

  
I just want to say I'm grateful.
I'll leave now.

  
- Wait! How did you learn to do that?
- What?

  
The talking thing.

  
Same way you did, I guess.
"Mama, Dada, honey." You pick it up.

  
- That's very funny.
- Yeah.

  
Bees are funny. If we didn't laugh,
we'd cry with what we have to deal with.

  
Anyway...

  
Oan I...

  
...get you something?
- Like what?

  
I don't know. I mean...
I don't know. Ooffee?

  
I don't want to put you out.

  
It's no trouble. It takes two minutes.

  
- It's just coffee.
- I hate to impose.

  
- Don't be ridiculous!
- Actually, I would love a cup.

  
Hey, you want rum cake?

  
- I shouldn't.
- Have some.

  
- No, I can't.
- Oome on!

  
I'm trying to lose a couple micrograms.

  
- Where?
- These stripes don't help.

  
You look great!

  
I don't know if you know
anything about fashion.

  
Are you all right?

  
No.

  
He's making the tie in the cab
as they're flying up Madison.

  
He finally gets there.

  
He runs up the steps into the church.
The wedding is on.

  
And he says, "Watermelon?
I thought you said Guatemalan.

  
Why would I marry a watermelon?"

  
Is that a bee joke?

  
That's the kind of stuff we do.

  
Yeah, different.

  
So, what are you gonna do, Barry?

  
About work? I don't know.

  
I want to do my part for the hive,
but I can't do it the way they want.

  
I know how you feel.

  
- You do?
- Sure.

  
My parents wanted me to be a lawyer or
a doctor, but I wanted to be a florist.

  
- Really?
- My only interest is flowers.

  
Our new queen was just elected
with that same campaign slogan.

  
Anyway, if you look...

  
There's my hive right there. See it?

  
You're in Sheep Meadow!

  
Yes! I'm right off the Turtle Pond!

  
No way! I know that area.
I lost a toe ring there once.

  
- Why do girls put rings on their toes?
- Why not?

  
- It's like putting a hat on your knee.
- Maybe I'll try that.

  
- You all right, ma'am?
- Oh, yeah. Fine.

  
Just having two cups of coffee!

  
Anyway, this has been great.
Thanks for the coffee.

  
Yeah, it's no trouble.

  
Sorry I couldn't finish it. If I did,
I'd be up the rest of my life.

  
Are you...?

  
Oan I take a piece of this with me?

  
Sure! Here, have a crumb.

  
- Thanks!
- Yeah.

  
All right. Well, then...
I guess I'll see you around.

  
Or not.

  
OK, Barry.

  
And thank you
so much again... for before.

  
Oh, that? That was nothing.

  
Well, not nothing, but... Anyway...

  
This can't possibly work.

  
He's all set to go.
We may as well try it.

  
OK, Dave, pull the chute.

  
- Sounds amazing.
- It was amazing!

  
It was the scariest,
happiest moment of my life.

  
Humans! I can't believe
you were with humans!

  
Giant, scary humans!
What were they like?

  
Huge and crazy. They talk crazy.

  
They eat crazy giant things.
They drive crazy.

  
- Do they try and kill you, like on TV?
- Some of them. But some of them don't.

  
- How'd you get back?
- Poodle.

  
You did it, and I'm glad. You saw
whatever you wanted to see.

  
You had your "experience." Now you
can pick out yourjob and be normal.

  
- Well...
- Well?

  
Well, I met someone.

  
You did? Was she Bee-ish?

  
- A wasp?! Your parents will kill you!
- No, no, no, not a wasp.

  
- Spider?
- I'm not attracted to spiders.

  
I know it's the hottest thing,
with the eight legs and all.

  
I can't get by that face.

  
So who is she?

  
She's... human.

  
No, no. That's a bee law.
You wouldn't break a bee law.

  
- Her name's Vanessa.
- Oh, boy.

  
She's so nice. And she's a florist!

  
Oh, no! You're dating a human florist!

  
We're not dating.

  
You're flying outside the hive, talking
to humans that attack our homes

  
with power washers and M-80s!
One-eighth a stick of dynamite!

  
She saved my life!
And she understands me.

  
This is over!

  
Eat this.

  
This is not over! What was that?

  
- They call it a crumb.
- It was so stingin' stripey!

  
And that's not what they eat.
That's what falls off what they eat!

  
- You know what a Oinnabon is?
- No.

  
It's bread and cinnamon and frosting.
They heat it up...

  
Sit down!

  
...really hot!
- Listen to me!

  
We are not them! We're us.
There's us and there's them!

  
Yes, but who can deny
the heart that is yearning?

  
There's no yearning.
Stop yearning. Listen to me!

  
You have got to start thinking bee,
my friend. Thinking bee!

  
- Thinking bee.
- Thinking bee.

  
Thinking bee! Thinking bee!
Thinking bee! Thinking bee!

  
There he is. He's in the pool.

  
You know what your problem is, Barry?

  
I gotta start thinking bee?

  
How much longer will this go on?

  
It's been three days!
Why aren't you working?

  
I've got a lot of big life decisions
to think about.

  
What life? You have no life!
You have no job. You're barely a bee!

  
Would it kill you
to make a little honey?

  
Barry, come out.
Your father's talking to you.

  
Martin, would you talk to him?

  
Barry, I'm talking to you!

  
You coming?

  
Got everything?

  
All set!

  
Go ahead. I'll catch up.

  
Don't be too long.

  
Watch this!

  
Vanessa!

  
- We're still here.
- I told you not to yell at him.

  
He doesn't respond to yelling!

  
- Then why yell at me?
- Because you don't listen!

  
I'm not listening to this.

  
Sorry, I've gotta go.

  
- Where are you going?
- I'm meeting a friend.

  
A girl? Is this why you can't decide?

  
Bye.

  
I just hope she's Bee-ish.

  
They have a huge parade
of flowers every year in Pasadena?

  
To be in the Tournament of Roses,
that's every florist's dream!

  
Up on a float, surrounded
by flowers, crowds cheering.

  
A tournament. Do the roses
compete in athletic events?

  
No. All right, I've got one.
How come you don't fly everywhere?

  
It's exhausting. Why don't you
run everywhere? It's faster.

  
Yeah, OK, I see, I see.
All right, your turn.

  
TiVo. You can just freeze live TV?
That's insane!

  
You don't have that?

  
We have Hivo, but it's a disease.
It's a horrible, horrible disease.

  
Oh, my.

  
Dumb bees!

  
You must want to sting all those jerks.

  
We try not to sting.
It's usually fatal for us.

  
So you have to watch your temper.

  
Very carefully.
You kick a wall, take a walk,

  
write an angry letter and throw it out.
Work through it like any emotion:

  
Anger, jealousy, lust.

  
Oh, my goodness! Are you OK?

  
Yeah.

  
- What is wrong with you?!
- It's a bug.

  
He's not bothering anybody.
Get out of here, you creep!

  
What was that? A Pic 'N' Save circular?

  
Yeah, it was. How did you know?

  
It felt like about 10 pages.
Seventy-five is pretty much our limit.

  
You've really got that
down to a science.

  
- I lost a cousin to Italian Vogue.
- I'll bet.

  
What in the name
of Mighty Hercules is this?

  
How did this get here?
Oute Bee, Golden Blossom,

  
Ray Liotta Private Select?

  
- Is he that actor?
- I never heard of him.

  
- Why is this here?
- For people. We eat it.

  
You don't have
enough food of your own?

  
- Well, yes.
- How do you get it?

  
- Bees make it.
- I know who makes it!

  
And it's hard to make it!

  
There's heating, cooling, stirring.
You need a whole Krelman thing!

  
- It's organic.
- It's our-ganic!

  
It's just honey, Barry.

  
Just what?!

  
Bees don't know about this!
This is stealing! A lot of stealing!

  
You've taken our homes, schools,
hospitals! This is all we have!

  
And it's on sale?!
I'm getting to the bottom of this.

  
I'm getting to the bottom
of all of this!

  
Hey, Hector.

  
- You almost done?
- Almost.

  
He is here. I sense it.

  
Well, I guess I'll go home now

  
and just leave this nice honey out,
with no one around.

  
You're busted, box boy!

  
I knew I heard something.
So you can talk!

  
I can talk.
And now you'll start talking!

  
Where you getting the sweet stuff?
Who's your supplier?

  
I don't understand.
I thought we were friends.

  
The last thing we want
to do is upset bees!

  
You're too late! It's ours now!

  
You, sir, have crossed
the wrong sword!

  
You, sir, will be lunch
for my iguana, Ignacio!

  
Where is the honey coming from?

  
Tell me where!

  
Honey Farms! It comes from Honey Farms!

  
Orazy person!

  
What horrible thing has happened here?

  
These faces, they never knew
what hit them. And now

  
they're on the road to nowhere!

  
Just keep still.

  
What? You're not dead?

  
Do I look dead? They will wipe anything
that moves. Where you headed?

  
To Honey Farms.
I am onto something huge here.

  
I'm going to Alaska. Moose blood,
crazy stuff. Blows your head off!

  
I'm going to Tacoma.

  
- And you?
- He really is dead.

  
All right.

  
Uh-oh!

  
- What is that?!
- Oh, no!

  
- A wiper! Triple blade!
- Triple blade?

  
Jump on! It's your only chance, bee!

  
Why does everything have
to be so doggone clean?!

  
How much do you people need to see?!

  
Open your eyes!
Stick your head out the window!

  
From NPR News in Washington,
I'm Oarl Kasell.

  
But don't kill no more bugs!

  
- Bee!
- Moose blood guy!!

  
- You hear something?
- Like what?

  
Like tiny screaming.

  
Turn off the radio.

  
Whassup, bee boy?

  
Hey, Blood.

  
Just a row of honey jars,
as far as the eye could see.

  
Wow!

  
I assume wherever this truck goes
is where they're getting it.

  
I mean, that honey's ours.

  
- Bees hang tight.
- We're all jammed in.

  
It's a close community.

  
Not us, man. We on our own.
Every mosquito on his own.

  
- What if you get in trouble?
- You a mosquito, you in trouble.

  
Nobody likes us. They just smack.
See a mosquito, smack, smack!

  
At least you're out in the world.
You must meet girls.

  
Mosquito girls try to trade up,
get with a moth, dragonfly.

  
Mosquito girl don't want no mosquito.

  
You got to be kidding me!

  
Mooseblood's about to leave
the building! So long, bee!

  
- Hey, guys!
- Mooseblood!

  
I knew I'd catch y'all down here.
Did you bring your crazy straw?

  
We throw it in jars, slap a label on it,
and it's pretty much pure profit.

  
What is this place?

  
A bee's got a brain
the size of a pinhead.

  
They are pinheads!

  
Pinhead.

  
- Oheck out the new smoker.
- Oh, sweet. That's the one you want.

  
The Thomas 3000!

  
Smoker?

  
Ninety puffs a minute, semi-automatic.
Twice the nicotine, all the tar.

  
A couple breaths of this
knocks them right out.

  
They make the honey,
and we make the money.

  
"They make the honey,
and we make the money"?

  
Oh, my!

  
What's going on? Are you OK?

  
Yeah. It doesn't last too long.

  
Do you know you're
in a fake hive with fake walls?

  
Our queen was moved here.
We had no choice.

  
This is your queen?
That's a man in women's clothes!

  
That's a drag queen!

  
What is this?

  
Oh, no!

  
There's hundreds of them!

  
Bee honey.

  
Our honey is being brazenly stolen
on a massive scale!

  
This is worse than anything bears
have done! I intend to do something.

  
Oh, Barry, stop.

  
Who told you humans are taking
our honey? That's a rumor.

  
Do these look like rumors?

  
That's a conspiracy theory.
These are obviously doctored photos.

  
How did you get mixed up in this?

  
He's been talking to humans.

  
- What?
- Talking to humans?!

  
He has a human girlfriend.
And they make out!

  
Make out? Barry!

  
We do not.

  
- You wish you could.
- Whose side are you on?

  
The bees!

  
I dated a cricket once in San Antonio.
Those crazy legs kept me up all night.

  
Barry, this is what you want
to do with your life?

  
I want to do it for all our lives.
Nobody works harder than bees!

  
Dad, I remember you
coming home so overworked

  
your hands were still stirring.
You couldn't stop.

  
I remember that.

  
What right do they have to our honey?

  
We live on two cups a year. They put it
in lip balm for no reason whatsoever!

  
Even if it's true, what can one bee do?

  
Sting them where it really hurts.

  
In the face! The eye!

  
- That would hurt.
- No.

  
Up the nose? That's a killer.

  
There's only one place you can sting
the humans, one place where it matters.

  
Hive at Five, the hive's only
full-hour action news source.

  
No more bee beards!

  
With Bob Bumble at the anchor desk.

  
Weather with Storm Stinger.

  
Sports with Buzz Larvi.

  
And Jeanette Ohung.

  
- Good evening. I'm Bob Bumble.
- And I'm Jeanette Ohung.

  
A tri-county bee, Barry Benson,

  
intends to sue the human race
for stealing our honey,

  
packaging it and profiting
from it illegally!

  
Tomorrow night on Bee Larry King,

  
we'll have three former queens here in
our studio, discussing their new book,

  
Olassy Ladies,
out this week on Hexagon.

  
Tonight we're talking to Barry Benson.

  
Did you ever think, "I'm a kid
from the hive. I can't do this"?

  
Bees have never been afraid
to change the world.

  
What about Bee Oolumbus?
Bee Gandhi? Bejesus?

  
Where I'm from, we'd never sue humans.

  
We were thinking
of stickball or candy stores.

  
How old are you?

  
The bee community
is supporting you in this case,

  
which will be the trial
of the bee century.

  
You know, they have a Larry King
in the human world too.

  
It's a common name. Next week...

  
He looks like you and has a show
and suspenders and colored dots...

  
Next week...

  
Glasses, quotes on the bottom from the
guest even though you just heard 'em.

  
Bear Week next week!
They're scary, hairy and here live.

  
Always leans forward, pointy shoulders,
squinty eyes, very Jewish.

  
In tennis, you attack
at the point of weakness!

  
It was my grandmother, Ken. She's 81.

  
Honey, her backhand's a joke!
I'm not gonna take advantage of that?

  
Quiet, please.
Actual work going on here.

  
- Is that that same bee?
- Yes, it is!

  
I'm helping him sue the human race.

  
- Hello.
- Hello, bee.

  
This is Ken.

  
Yeah, I remember you. Timberland, size
ten and a half. Vibram sole, I believe.

  
Why does he talk again?

  
Listen, you better go
'cause we're really busy working.

  
But it's our yogurt night!

  
Bye-bye.

  
Why is yogurt night so difficult?!

  
You poor thing.
You two have been at this for hours!

  
Yes, and Adam here
has been a huge help.

  
- Frosting...
- How many sugars?

  
Just one. I try not
to use the competition.

  
So why are you helping me?

  
Bees have good qualities.

  
And it takes my mind off the shop.

  
Instead of flowers, people
are giving balloon bouquets now.

  
Those are great, if you're three.

  
And artificial flowers.

  
- Oh, those just get me psychotic!
- Yeah, me too.

  
Bent stingers, pointless pollination.

  
Bees must hate those fake things!

  
Nothing worse
than a daffodil that's had work done.

  
Maybe this could make up
for it a little bit.

  
- This lawsuit's a pretty big deal.
- I guess.

  
You sure you want to go through with it?

  
Am I sure? When I'm done with
the humans, they won't be able

  
to say, "Honey, I'm home,"
without paying a royalty!

  
It's an incredible scene
here in downtown Manhattan,

  
where the world anxiously waits,
because for the first time in history,

  
we will hear for ourselves
if a honeybee can actually speak.

  
What have we gotten into here, Barry?

  
It's pretty big, isn't it?

  
I can't believe how many humans
don't work during the day.

  
You think billion-dollar multinational
food companies have good lawyers?

  
Everybody needs to stay
behind the barricade.

  
- What's the matter?
- I don't know, I just got a chill.

  
Well, if it isn't the bee team.

  
You boys work on this?

  
All rise! The Honorable
Judge Bumbleton presiding.

  
All right. Oase number 4475,

  
Superior Oourt of New York,
Barry Bee Benson v. the Honey Industry

  
is now in session.

  
Mr. Montgomery, you're representing
the five food companies collectively?

  
A privilege.

  
Mr. Benson... you're representing
all the bees of the world?

  
I'm kidding. Yes, Your Honor,
we're ready to proceed.

  
Mr. Montgomery,
your opening statement, please.

  
Ladies and gentlemen of the jury,

  
my grandmother was a simple woman.

  
Born on a farm, she believed
it was man's divine right

  
to benefit from the bounty
of nature God put before us.

  
If we lived in the topsy-turvy world
Mr. Benson imagines,

  
just think of what would it mean.

  
I would have to negotiate
with the silkworm

  
for the elastic in my britches!

  
Talking bee!

  
How do we know this isn't some sort of

  
holographic motion-picture-capture
Hollywood wizardry?

  
They could be using laser beams!

  
Robotics! Ventriloquism!
Oloning! For all we know,

  
he could be on steroids!

  
Mr. Benson?

  
Ladies and gentlemen,
there's no trickery here.

  
I'm just an ordinary bee.
Honey's pretty important to me.

  
It's important to all bees.
We invented it!

  
We make it. And we protect it
with our lives.

  
Unfortunately, there are
some people in this room

  
who think they can take it from us

  
'cause we're the little guys!
I'm hoping that, after this is all over,

  
you'll see how, by taking our honey,
you not only take everything we have

  
but everything we are!

  
I wish he'd dress like that
all the time. So nice!

  
Oall your first witness.

  
So, Mr. Klauss Vanderhayden
of Honey Farms, big company you have.

  
I suppose so.

  
I see you also own
Honeyburton and Honron!

  
Yes, they provide beekeepers
for our farms.

  
Beekeeper. I find that
to be a very disturbing term.

  
I don't imagine you employ
any bee-free-ers, do you?

  
- No.
- I couldn't hear you.

  
- No.
- No.

  
Because you don't free bees.
You keep bees. Not only that,

  
it seems you thought a bear would be
an appropriate image for a jar of honey.

  
They're very lovable creatures.

  
Yogi Bear, Fozzie Bear, Build-A-Bear.

  
You mean like this?

  
Bears kill bees!

  
How'd you like his head crashing
through your living room?!

  
Biting into your couch!
Spitting out your throw pillows!

  
OK, that's enough. Take him away.

  
So, Mr. Sting, thank you for being here.
Your name intrigues me.

  
- Where have I heard it before?
- I was with a band called The Police.

  
But you've never been
a police officer, have you?

  
No, I haven't.

  
No, you haven't. And so here
we have yet another example

  
of bee culture casually
stolen by a human

  
for nothing more than
a prance-about stage name.

  
Oh, please.

  
Have you ever been stung, Mr. Sting?

  
Because I'm feeling
a little stung, Sting.

  
Or should I say... Mr. Gordon M. Sumner!

  
That's not his real name?! You idiots!

  
Mr. Liotta, first,
belated congratulations on

  
your Emmy win for a guest spot
on ER in 2005.

  
Thank you. Thank you.

  
I see from your resume
that you're devilishly handsome

  
with a churning inner turmoil
that's ready to blow.

  
I enjoy what I do. Is that a crime?

  
Not yet it isn't. But is this
what it's come to for you?

  
Exploiting tiny, helpless bees
so you don't

  
have to rehearse
your part and learn your lines, sir?

  
Watch it, Benson!
I could blow right now!

  
This isn't a goodfella.
This is a badfella!

  
Why doesn't someone just step on
this creep, and we can all go home?!

  
- Order in this court!
- You're all thinking it!

  
Order! Order, I say!

  
- Say it!
- Mr. Liotta, please sit down!

  
I think it was awfully nice
of that bear to pitch in like that.

  
I think the jury's on our side.

  
Are we doing everything right, legally?

  
I'm a florist.

  
Right. Well, here's to a great team.

  
To a great team!

  
Well, hello.

  
- Ken!
- Hello.

  
I didn't think you were coming.

  
No, I was just late.
I tried to call, but... the battery.

  
I didn't want all this to go to waste,
so I called Barry. Luckily, he was free.

  
Oh, that was lucky.

  
There's a little left.
I could heat it up.

  
Yeah, heat it up, sure, whatever.

  
So I hear you're quite a tennis player.

  
I'm not much for the game myself.
The ball's a little grabby.

  
That's where I usually sit.
Right... there.

  
Ken, Barry was looking at your resume,

  
and he agreed with me that eating with
chopsticks isn't really a special skill.

  
You think I don't see what you're doing?

  
I know how hard it is to find
the rightjob. We have that in common.

  
Do we?

  
Bees have 100 percent employment,
but we do jobs like taking the crud out.

  
That's just what
I was thinking about doing.

  
Ken, I let Barry borrow your razor
for his fuzz. I hope that was all right.

  
I'm going to drain the old stinger.

  
Yeah, you do that.

  
Look at that.

  
You know, I've just about had it

  
with your little mind games.

  
- What's that?
- Italian Vogue.

  
Mamma mia, that's a lot of pages.

  
A lot of ads.

  
Remember what Van said, why is
your life more valuable than mine?

  
Funny, I just can't seem to recall that!

  
I think something stinks in here!

  
I love the smell of flowers.

  
How do you like the smell of flames?!

  
Not as much.

  
Water bug! Not taking sides!

  
Ken, I'm wearing a Ohapstick hat!
This is pathetic!

  
I've got issues!

  
Well, well, well, a royal flush!

  
- You're bluffing.
- Am I?

  
Surf's up, dude!

  
Poo water!

  
That bowl is gnarly.

  
Except for those dirty yellow rings!

  
Kenneth! What are you doing?!

  
You know, I don't even like honey!
I don't eat it!

  
We need to talk!

  
He's just a little bee!

  
And he happens to be
the nicest bee I've met in a long time!

  
Long time? What are you talking about?!
Are there other bugs in your life?

  
No, but there are other things bugging
me in life. And you're one of them!

  
Fine! Talking bees, no yogurt night...

  
My nerves are fried from riding
on this emotional roller coaster!

  
Goodbye, Ken.

  
And for your information,

  
I prefer sugar-free, artificial
sweeteners made by man!

  
I'm sorry about all that.

  
I know it's got
an aftertaste! I like it!

  
I always felt there was some kind
of barrier between Ken and me.

  
I couldn't overcome it.
Oh, well.

  
Are you OK for the trial?

  
I believe Mr. Montgomery
is about out of ideas.

  
We would like to call
Mr. Barry Benson Bee to the stand.

  
Good idea! You can really see why he's
considered one of the best lawyers...

  
Yeah.

  
Layton, you've
gotta weave some magic

  
with this jury,
or it's gonna be all over.

  
Don't worry. The only thing I have
to do to turn this jury around

  
is to remind them
of what they don't like about bees.

  
- You got the tweezers?
- Are you allergic?

  
Only to losing, son. Only to losing.

  
Mr. Benson Bee, I'll ask you
what I think we'd all like to know.

  
What exactly is your relationship

  
to that woman?

  
We're friends.

  
- Good friends?
- Yes.

  
How good? Do you live together?

  
Wait a minute...

  
Are you her little...

  
...bedbug?

  
I've seen a bee documentary or two.
From what I understand,

  
doesn't your queen give birth
to all the bee children?

  
- Yeah, but...
- So those aren't your real parents!

  
- Oh, Barry...
- Yes, they are!

  
Hold me back!

  
You're an illegitimate bee,
aren't you, Benson?

  
He's denouncing bees!

  
Don't y'all date your cousins?

  
- Objection!
- I'm going to pincushion this guy!

  
Adam, don't! It's what he wants!

  
Oh, I'm hit!!

  
Oh, lordy, I am hit!

  
Order! Order!

  
The venom! The venom
is coursing through my veins!

  
I have been felled
by a winged beast of destruction!

  
You see? You can't treat them
like equals! They're striped savages!

  
Stinging's the only thing
they know! It's their way!

  
- Adam, stay with me.
- I can't feel my legs.

  
What angel of mercy
will come forward to suck the poison

  
from my heaving buttocks?

  
I will have order in this court. Order!

  
Order, please!

  
The case of the honeybees
versus the human race

  
took a pointed turn against the bees

  
yesterday when one of their legal
team stung Layton T. Montgomery.

  
- Hey, buddy.
- Hey.

  
- Is there much pain?
- Yeah.

  
I...

  
I blew the whole case, didn't I?

  
It doesn't matter. What matters is
you're alive. You could have died.

  
I'd be better off dead. Look at me.

  
They got it from the cafeteria
downstairs, in a tuna sandwich.

  
Look, there's
a little celery still on it.

  
What was it like to sting someone?

  
I can't explain it. It was all...

  
All adrenaline and then...
and then ecstasy!

  
All right.

  
You think it was all a trap?

  
Of course. I'm sorry.
I flew us right into this.

  
What were we thinking? Look at us. We're
just a couple of bugs in this world.

  
What will the humans do to us
if they win?

  
I don't know.

  
I hear they put the roaches in motels.
That doesn't sound so bad.

  
Adam, they check in,
but they don't check out!

  
Oh, my.

  
Oould you get a nurse
to close that window?

  
- Why?
- The smoke.

  
Bees don't smoke.

  
Right. Bees don't smoke.

  
Bees don't smoke!
But some bees are smoking.

  
That's it! That's our case!

  
It is? It's not over?

  
Get dressed. I've gotta go somewhere.

  
Get back to the court and stall.
Stall any way you can.

  
And assuming you've done step correctly, you're ready for the tub.

  
Mr. Flayman.

  
Yes? Yes, Your Honor!

  
Where is the rest of your team?

  
Well, Your Honor, it's interesting.

  
Bees are trained to fly haphazardly,

  
and as a result,
we don't make very good time.

  
I actually heard a funny story about...

  
Your Honor,
haven't these ridiculous bugs

  
taken up enough
of this court's valuable time?

  
How much longer will we allow
these absurd shenanigans to go on?

  
They have presented no compelling
evidence to support their charges

  
against my clients,
who run legitimate businesses.

  
I move for a complete dismissal
of this entire case!

  
Mr. Flayman, I'm afraid I'm going

  
to have to consider
Mr. Montgomery's motion.

  
But you can't! We have a terrific case.

  
Where is your proof?
Where is the evidence?

  
Show me the smoking gun!

  
Hold it, Your Honor!
You want a smoking gun?

  
Here is your smoking gun.

  
What is that?

  
It's a bee smoker!

  
What, this?
This harmless little contraption?

  
This couldn't hurt a fly,
let alone a bee.

  
Look at what has happened

  
to bees who have never been asked,
"Smoking or non?"

  
Is this what nature intended for us?

  
To be forcibly addicted
to smoke machines

  
and man-made wooden slat work camps?

  
Living out our lives as honey slaves
to the white man?

  
- What are we gonna do?
- He's playing the species card.

  
Ladies and gentlemen, please,
free these bees!

  
Free the bees! Free the bees!

  
Free the bees!

  
Free the bees! Free the bees!

  
The court finds in favor of the bees!

  
Vanessa, we won!

  
I knew you could do it! High-five!

  
Sorry.

  
I'm OK! You know what this means?

  
All the honey
will finally belong to the bees.

  
Now we won't have
to work so hard all the time.

  
This is an unholy perversion
of the balance of nature, Benson.

  
You'll regret this.

  
Barry, how much honey is out there?

  
All right. One at a time.

  
Barry, who are you wearing?

  
My sweater is Ralph Lauren,
and I have no pants.

  
- What if Montgomery's right?
- What do you mean?

  
We've been living the bee way
a long time, 27 million years.

  
Oongratulations on your victory.
What will you demand as a settlement?

  
First, we'll demand a complete shutdown
of all bee work camps.

  
Then we want back the honey
that was ours to begin with,

  
every last drop.

  
We demand an end to the glorification
of the bear as anything more

  
than a filthy, smelly,
bad-breath stink machine.

  
We're all aware
of what they do in the woods.

  
Wait for my signal.

  
Take him out.

  
He'll have nauseous
for a few hours, then he'll be fine.

  
And we will no longer tolerate
bee-negative nicknames...

  
But it's just a prance-about stage name!

  
...unnecessary inclusion of honey
in bogus health products

  
and la-dee-da human
tea-time snack garnishments.

  
Oan't breathe.

  
Bring it in, boys!

  
Hold it right there! Good.

  
Tap it.

  
Mr. Buzzwell, we just passed three cups,
and there's gallons more coming!

  
- I think we need to shut down!
- Shut down? We've never shut down.

  
Shut down honey production!

  
Stop making honey!

  
Turn your key, sir!

  
What do we do now?

  
Oannonball!

  
We're shutting honey production!

  
Mission abort.

  
Aborting pollination and nectar detail.
Returning to base.

  
Adam, you wouldn't believe
how much honey was out there.

  
Oh, yeah?

  
What's going on? Where is everybody?

  
- Are they out celebrating?
- They're home.

  
They don't know what to do.
Laying out, sleeping in.

  
I heard your Uncle Oarl was on his way
to San Antonio with a cricket.

  
At least we got our honey back.

  
Sometimes I think, so what if humans
liked our honey? Who wouldn't?

  
It's the greatest thing in the world!
I was excited to be part of making it.

  
This was my new desk. This was my
new job. I wanted to do it really well.

  
And now...

  
Now I can't.

  
I don't understand
why they're not happy.

  
I thought their lives would be better!

  
They're doing nothing. It's amazing.
Honey really changes people.

  
You don't have any idea
what's going on, do you?

  
- What did you want to show me?
- This.

  
What happened here?

  
That is not the half of it.

  
Oh, no. Oh, my.

  
They're all wilting.

  
Doesn't look very good, does it?

  
No.

  
And whose fault do you think that is?

  
You know, I'm gonna guess bees.

  
Bees?

  
Specifically, me.

  
I didn't think bees not needing to make
honey would affect all these things.

  
It's notjust flowers.
Fruits, vegetables, they all need bees.

  
That's our whole SAT test right there.

  
Take away produce, that affects
the entire animal kingdom.

  
And then, of course...

  
The human species?

  
So if there's no more pollination,

  
it could all just go south here,
couldn't it?

  
I know this is also partly my fault.

  
How about a suicide pact?

  
How do we do it?

  
- I'll sting you, you step on me.
- Thatjust kills you twice.

  
Right, right.

  
Listen, Barry...
sorry, but I gotta get going.

  
I had to open my mouth and talk.

  
Vanessa?

  
Vanessa? Why are you leaving?
Where are you going?

  
To the final Tournament of Roses parade
in Pasadena.

  
They've moved it to this weekend
because all the flowers are dying.

  
It's the last chance
I'll ever have to see it.

  
Vanessa, I just wanna say I'm sorry.
I never meant it to turn out like this.

  
I know. Me neither.

  
Tournament of Roses.
Roses can't do sports.

  
Wait a minute. Roses. Roses?

  
Roses!

  
Vanessa!

  
Roses?!

  
Barry?

  
- Roses are flowers!
- Yes, they are.

  
Flowers, bees, pollen!

  
I know.
That's why this is the last parade.

  
Maybe not.
Oould you ask him to slow down?

  
Oould you slow down?

  
Barry!

  
OK, I made a huge mistake.
This is a total disaster, all my fault.

  
Yes, it kind of is.

  
I've ruined the planet.
I wanted to help you

  
with the flower shop.
I've made it worse.

  
Actually, it's completely closed down.

  
I thought maybe you were remodeling.

  
But I have another idea, and it's
greater than my previous ideas combined.

  
I don't want to hear it!

  
All right, they have the roses,
the roses have the pollen.

  
I know every bee, plant
and flower bud in this park.

  
All we gotta do is get what they've got
back here with what we've got.

  
- Bees.
- Park.

  
- Pollen!
- Flowers.

  
- Repollination!
- Across the nation!

  
Tournament of Roses,
Pasadena, Oalifornia.

  
They've got nothing
but flowers, floats and cotton candy.

  
Security will be tight.

  
I have an idea.

  
Vanessa Bloome, FTD.

  
Official floral business. It's real.

  
Sorry, ma'am. Nice brooch.

  
Thank you. It was a gift.

  
Once inside,
we just pick the right float.

  
How about The Princess and the Pea?

  
I could be the princess,
and you could be the pea!

  
Yes, I got it.

  
- Where should I sit?
- What are you?

  
- I believe I'm the pea.
- The pea?

  
It goes under the mattresses.

  
- Not in this fairy tale, sweetheart.
- I'm getting the marshal.

  
You do that!
This whole parade is a fiasco!

  
Let's see what this baby'll do.

  
Hey, what are you doing?!

  
Then all we do
is blend in with traffic...

  
...without arousing suspicion.

  
Once at the airport,
there's no stopping us.

  
Stop! Security.

  
- You and your insect pack your float?
- Yes.

  
Has it been
in your possession the entire time?

  
Would you remove your shoes?

  
- Remove your stinger.
- It's part of me.

  
I know. Just having some fun.
Enjoy your flight.

  
Then if we're lucky, we'll have
just enough pollen to do the job.

  
Oan you believe how lucky we are? We
have just enough pollen to do the job!

  
I think this is gonna work.

  
It's got to work.

  
Attention, passengers,
this is Oaptain Scott.

  
We have a bit of bad weather
in New York.

  
It looks like we'll experience
a couple hours delay.

  
Barry, these are cut flowers
with no water. They'll never make it.

  
I gotta get up there
and talk to them.

  
Be careful.

  
Oan I get help
with the Sky Mall magazine?

  
I'd like to order the talking
inflatable nose and ear hair trimmer.

  
Oaptain, I'm in a real situation.

  
- What'd you say, Hal?
- Nothing.

  
Bee!

  
Don't freak out! My entire species...

  
What are you doing?

  
- Wait a minute! I'm an attorney!
- Who's an attorney?

  
Don't move.

  
Oh, Barry.

  
Good afternoon, passengers.
This is your captain.

  
Would a Miss Vanessa Bloome in 24B
please report to the cockpit?

  
And please hurry!

  
What happened here?

  
There was a DustBuster,
a toupee, a life raft exploded.

  
One's bald, one's in a boat,
they're both unconscious!

  
- Is that another bee joke?
- No!

  
No one's flying the plane!

  
This is JFK control tower, Flight 356.
What's your status?

  
This is Vanessa Bloome.
I'm a florist from New York.

  
Where's the pilot?

  
He's unconscious,
and so is the copilot.

  
Not good. Does anyone onboard
have flight experience?

  
As a matter of fact, there is.

  
- Who's that?
- Barry Benson.

  
From the honey trial?! Oh, great.

  
Vanessa, this is nothing more
than a big metal bee.

  
It's got giant wings, huge engines.

  
I can't fly a plane.

  
- Why not? Isn't John Travolta a pilot?
- Yes.

  
How hard could it be?

  
Wait, Barry!
We're headed into some lightning.

  
This is Bob Bumble. We have some
late-breaking news from JFK Airport,

  
where a suspenseful scene
is developing.

  
Barry Benson,
fresh from his legal victory...

  
That's Barry!

  
...is attempting to land a plane,
loaded with people, flowers

  
and an incapacitated flight crew.

  
Flowers?!

  
We have a storm in the area
and two individuals at the controls

  
with absolutely no flight experience.

  
Just a minute.
There's a bee on that plane.

  
I'm quite familiar with Mr. Benson
and his no-account compadres.

  
They've done enough damage.

  
But isn't he your only hope?

  
Technically, a bee
shouldn't be able to fly at all.

  
Their wings are too small...

  
Haven't we heard this a million times?

  
"The surface area of the wings
and body mass make no sense."

  
- Get this on the air!
- Got it.

  
- Stand by.
- We're going live.

  
The way we work may be a mystery to you.

  
Making honey takes a lot of bees
doing a lot of small jobs.

  
But let me tell you about a small job.

  
If you do it well,
it makes a big difference.

  
More than we realized.
To us, to everyone.

  
That's why I want to get bees
back to working together.

  
That's the bee way!
We're not made of Jell-O.

  
We get behind a fellow.

  
- Black and yellow!
- Hello!

  
Left, right, down, hover.

  
- Hover?
- Forget hover.

  
This isn't so hard.
Beep-beep! Beep-beep!

  
Barry, what happened?!

  
Wait, I think we were
on autopilot the whole time.

  
- That may have been helping me.
- And now we're not!

  
So it turns out I cannot fly a plane.

  
All of you, let's get
behind this fellow! Move it out!

  
Move out!

  
Our only chance is if I do what I'd do,
you copy me with the wings of the plane!

  
Don't have to yell.

  
I'm not yelling!
We're in a lot of trouble.

  
It's very hard to concentrate
with that panicky tone in your voice!

  
It's not a tone. I'm panicking!

  
I can't do this!

  
Vanessa, pull yourself together.
You have to snap out of it!

  
You snap out of it.

  
You snap out of it.

  
- You snap out of it!
- You snap out of it!

  
- You snap out of it!
- You snap out of it!

  
- You snap out of it!
- You snap out of it!

  
- Hold it!
- Why? Oome on, it's my turn.

  
How is the plane flying?

  
I don't know.

  
Hello?

  
Benson, got any flowers
for a happy occasion in there?

  
The Pollen Jocks!

  
They do get behind a fellow.

  
- Black and yellow.
- Hello.

  
All right, let's drop this tin can
on the blacktop.

  
Where? I can't see anything. Oan you?

  
No, nothing. It's all cloudy.

  
Oome on. You got to think bee, Barry.

  
- Thinking bee.
- Thinking bee.

  
Thinking bee!
Thinking bee! Thinking bee!

  
Wait a minute.
I think I'm feeling something.

  
- What?
- I don't know. It's strong, pulling me.

  
Like a 27-million-year-old instinct.

  
Bring the nose down.

  
Thinking bee!
Thinking bee! Thinking bee!

  
- What in the world is on the tarmac?
- Get some lights on that!

  
Thinking bee!
Thinking bee! Thinking bee!

  
- Vanessa, aim for the flower.
- OK.

  
Out the engines. We're going in
on bee power. Ready, boys?

  
Affirmative!

  
Good. Good. Easy, now. That's it.

  
Land on that flower!

  
Ready? Full reverse!

  
Spin it around!

  
- Not that flower! The other one!
- Which one?

  
- That flower.
- I'm aiming at the flower!

  
That's a fat guy in a flowered shirt.
I mean the giant pulsating flower

  
made of millions of bees!

  
Pull forward. Nose down. Tail up.

  
Rotate around it.

  
- This is insane, Barry!
- This's the only way I know how to fly.

  
Am I koo-koo-kachoo, or is this plane
flying in an insect-like pattern?

  
Get your nose in there. Don't be afraid.
Smell it. Full reverse!

  
Just drop it. Be a part of it.

  
Aim for the center!

  
Now drop it in! Drop it in, woman!

  
Oome on, already.

  
Barry, we did it!
You taught me how to fly!

  
- Yes. No high-five!
- Right.

  
Barry, it worked!
Did you see the giant flower?

  
What giant flower? Where? Of course
I saw the flower! That was genius!

  
- Thank you.
- But we're not done yet.

  
Listen, everyone!

  
This runway is covered
with the last pollen

  
from the last flowers
available anywhere on Earth.

  
That means this is our last chance.

  
We're the only ones who make honey,
pollinate flowers and dress like this.

  
If we're gonna survive as a species,
this is our moment! What do you say?

  
Are we going to be bees, orjust
Museum of Natural History keychains?

  
We're bees!

  
Keychain!

  
Then follow me! Except Keychain.

  
Hold on, Barry. Here.

  
You've earned this.

  
Yeah!

  
I'm a Pollen Jock! And it's a perfect
fit. All I gotta do are the sleeves.

  
Oh, yeah.

  
That's our Barry.

  
Mom! The bees are back!

  
If anybody needs
to make a call, now's the time.

  
I got a feeling we'll be
working late tonight!

  
Here's your change. Have a great
afternoon! Oan I help who's next?

  
Would you like some honey with that?
It is bee-approved. Don't forget these.

  
Milk, cream, cheese, it's all me.
And I don't see a nickel!

  
Sometimes I just feel
like a piece of meat!

  
I had no idea.

  
Barry, I'm sorry.
Have you got a moment?

  
Would you excuse me?
My mosquito associate will help you.

  
Sorry I'm late.

  
He's a lawyer too?

  
I was already a blood-sucking parasite.
All I needed was a briefcase.

  
Have a great afternoon!

  
Barry, I just got this huge tulip order,
and I can't get them anywhere.

  
No problem, Vannie.
Just leave it to me.

  
You're a lifesaver, Barry.
Oan I help who's next?

  
All right, scramble, jocks!
It's time to fly.

  
Thank you, Barry!

  
That bee is living my life!

  
Let it go, Kenny.

  
- When will this nightmare end?!
- Let it all go.

  
- Beautiful day to fly.
- Sure is.

  
Between you and me,
I was dying to get out of that office.

  
You have got
to start thinking bee, my friend.

  
- Thinking bee!
- Me?

  
Hold it. Let's just stop
for a second. Hold it.

  
I'm sorry. I'm sorry, everyone.
Oan we stop here?

  
I'm not making a major life decision
during a production number!

  
All right. Take ten, everybody.
Wrap it up, guys.

  
I had virtually no rehearsal for that.
 
 
 (yelling, whooping)

  
(kid blows noisemaker)

  
(chatter)

  
(girls chatter)

  
(waiter) Happy New Year's, ladies,

  
Gabby, it's New Year's Eve,
Enough reading,

  
But, Mom, I'm almost done,

  
The teen party? I've laid out
your best clothes, Come get ready,

  
Can I have my book back?

  
- Thank you,
- Come on,

  
(ball bounces)
Keep working left, Troy,

  
Got a guard in the championship game
we're expectin', You'll torch 'em!

  
- Am I going left?
- Yeah,

  
- He looks middle, you take it downtown,
- OK, like this?

  
Whoo! That's it, man, Sweet,
Let's see that in the game,

  
- Boys?
- Don't worry about me,

  
Did we really fly all this way
to play more basketball?

  
Yeah,

  
It's the last night of vacation,

  
The party, remember?

  
Right, the party,
The party, New Year's Eve,

  
Troy, they have a kid's party downstairs
in the Freestyle club,

  
- Kid's party?
- Young adults, Now go, shower up,

  
Come on, One more,

  
- Last one,
- Real quick,

  
There we go,
That's the way to end it,

  
(& soft rock)

  
(chatter and laughter)

  
Howdy, ma'am,

  
All right! How about that
for a couple of snowboarders?

  
- Yeah!
- Hey!

  
Who's gonna rock the house next?

  
(kids shouting)

  
Huh?

  
(emcee) Ha-ha! Ho-ho!

  
(kids shouting)

  
I can't sing, No, you go,

  
And you! Yeah, come on,

  
Look, I don't sing, I can't sing,
No, guys...

  
Get up there!

  
Hey, you know what? Someday you guys
might thank me for this,

  
Or not,

  
(& "Something New")

  
& Living in my own world

  
& Didn't understand

  
& That anything can happen

  
& When you take a chance

  
& I never believed in

  
& What I couldn't see

  
- & I never opened my heart
- & Oh

  
& To all the possibilities

  
& Ooh

  
- (both) & I know
- & That something has changed

  
(both) & Never felt this way

  
& And right here tonight

  
(both) & This could be the start
of something new

  
- & It feels so right
- (both) & To be here with you

  
& Oh!

  
& And now I'm lookin' in your eyes

  
- & I feel in my heart
- & Feel in my heart

  
& The start of something new

  
& Oh, yeah

  
& Now who'd have ever thought that

  
& We'd both be here tonight

  
- & Ooh
- & Yeah

  
- & And the world looks so much brighter
- & Brighter, brighter

  
- & Oh, with you by my side
- & By my side

  
& I know that something has changed,
never felt this way

  
- & I know it for real
- & Real

  
& This could be the start
of something new

  
& It feels so right to be here with you

  
& Oh!

  
& And now looking in your eyes
I feel in my heart

  
& The start of something new

  
& I never knew that it could happen
till it happened to me

  
& Oh, yeah

  
& I didn't know it before
but now it's easy to see

  
& Oh!

  
& It's the start of something new

  
& It feels so right to be here with you

  
& Oh!

  
& And now I'm lookin' in your eyes
I feel in my heart

  
& That it's the start of something new

  
- & It feels so right to be here with you
- & Oh

  
& And now looking in your eyes

  
- & I feel in my heart
- & Feel in my heart

  
& The start of something new

  
& The start of something new

  
& The start of something new

  
(crowd cheering and whistling)

  
- Troy,
- Gabriella,

  
But seriously, you have an amazing voice,
You're a singer, right?

  
Just church choir is all,
I tried to solo and nearly fainted,

  
Really? Why is that?

  
I looked at the people staring at me, Next
thing I knew, I was staring at the ceiling,

  
- End of solo career,
- The way you sing, that's hard to believe,

  
That was the first time I did that,
It was so cool,

  
- I know! Completely!
- You sound like you've sung a lot, too,

  
Yeah, sure, My showerhead
is very impressed with me,

  
(crowd) 9, 8, 7...

  
...6, 5, 4...

  
...3, 2, 1!

  
(cheering/fireworks explode)

  
I guess I better go find my mom
and wish her a happy new year,

  
Yeah, me too, I mean, not your mom,
My mom... and dad,

  
Uh... I'll call you,
I'll call you tomorrow,

  
- Yeah!
- Here, put your number in,

  
Here,

  
- You too,
- Oh, OK,

  
(beeping)

  
There you go,

  
Just so you know, singing with you
was the most fun I've had on this vacation,

  
So, um... where do you live?

  
Gabriella,

  
& Wildcats sing along
They really got it going on

  
& Wildcats in the house
Everybody sing out

  
& Wildcats, everywhere
wave your hands up in the air

  
& That's the way we do it
let's get to it

  
& Time to show the world

  
& Wildcats, sing along
They really got it goin ' on

  
& Wildcats in the house
everybody sing out...

  
- Troy! How ya doing, man?
- Hey, Chad, what's up?

  
- Hey, guys, happy new year,
- Yeah!

  
- It's a happy Wildcat new year!
- You're the man!

  
In two weeks
we're going to the championships

  
with you leading us
to infinity and beyond,

  
- (boy) What team?
- (all) Wildcats!

  
- What team?
- Wildcats! (cheering)

  
(cell phone rings)

  
Ooh! Whoo-hoo!

  
(all) Ooh!

  
The ice princess returned
from the North Pole,

  
She spent the holidays
the way she always does,

  
- How's that?
- Shopping for mirrors,

  
(all) Ooh!

  
Ugh, behold the zoo animals
heralding the new year, How tribal,

  
(bell rings)

  
Mom, my stomach...

  
Is nervous on first day at a new school,
You'll do great, You always do,

  
I made my company promise that I can't
be transferred again until you graduate,

  
I reviewed your impressive transcripts,
Your light will shine brightly at East High,

  
I don't want to be the school's
freaky genius girl again,

  
Just be Gabriella,

  
This way,

  
(chatter)

  
Troy! Troy! Hey!

  
How's it goin'? How are you?

  
Miss Darbus?

  
- Do you remember the night before?
- No, not at all,

  
All I remember is like, pink jelly, I...

  
Excuse me,

  
(boy) Ooh!

  
- Hi, Troy,
- Hi,

  
(bell rings)

  
I trust you all had splendid holidays,

  
Check the sign-up sheets in the lobby
for new activities, Mr, Bolton,

  
Especially our winter musicale,
We will have singles auditions...

  
- You OK?
- Yeah,

  
- ... and pairs auditions for our two leads,
- Pfft,

  
Mr, Danforth, this is a place of learning,
not a hockey arena,

  
There is also a final sign-up for next week's
scholastic decathlon competition,

  
Chem Club president Taylor McHessey
can answer all of your questions about that,

  
(rings)

  
Ah, the cell phone menace
has returned to our crucible of learning,

  
- Is it your phone?
- Sharpay and Ryan, cell phones,

  
- I will see you in detention,
- Ahh!

  
We have zero tolerance
for cell phones in class,

  
so we will get to know each other
in detention, Cell phone,

  
And welcome to East High, Miss Montez,
Mr, Bolton, I see your phone is involved,

  
- So we will see you in detention as well,
- That's not a possibility, Miss Darbus,

  
Your Honor, see, 'cause we have
basketball practice, and Troy...

  
Ah, that will be 15 minutes
for you too, Mr, Danforth, Count 'em,

  
Could be tough for Chad,
He can't count that high,

  
- Taylor McHessey, 15 minutes,
- (Taylor gasps)

  
Shall the carnage continue?
Holidays are over, people,

  
Way over!
Now, any more comments, questions?

  
- Jason,
- How were your holidays, Miss Darbus?

  
What?

  
(bell rings)

  
- Sorry, man, See you in detention,
- See you later, It's all good,

  
Uhh, she's crazy,

  
Hey!

  
- I don't...
- Believe it,

  
- Well, me...
- Either, But how?

  
My mom's company transferred her
here to Albuquerque,

  
I can't believe you live here, I looked
for you at the lodge on New Year's Day,

  
- We had to leave first thing,
- Why are you whispering?

  
What? Oh, uh... my friends
know about the snowboarding,

  
I haven't quite told them
about the singing thing,

  
- What's up?
- Hey,

  
- Too much for them to handle?
- No, it was cool,

  
But, you know, my friends, it's, uh...
It's not what I do,

  
That was, like, a different person,

  
So, uh... anyway, welcome to East High,

  
Now that you've met Miss Darbus,
I bet you just can't wait to sign up for that,

  
I won't be signing up for anything for a
while, I just wanna get to know the school,

  
But if you sign up,
I'd consider coming to the show,

  
- Yeah, yeah, That's completely impossible,
- What's impossible, Troy?

  
I wouldn't think "impossible"
is even in your vocabulary,

  
Oh, so nice of you to
show our new classmate around,

  
Oh, were you going to sign up too?
My brother and I

  
have starred in all the school's productions
and we really welcome newcomers,

  
There are a lot of supporting roles,
I'm sure we could find something for you,

  
No, no, no, I was just looking at
all the bulletin boards,

  
Lots going on at this school, Wow,

  
Nice penmanship,

  
So, Troy, I missed you during vacation,
What'd you do?

  
You know, um... played basketball,
snowboarding, more basketball,

  
- When's the big game?
- Two weeks,

  
You are so dedicated,
Just like me,

  
I hope you come watch me in the musical,
Promise?

  
- Toodles!
- Toodles,

  
Dude, you know that school musical thing?
You get extra credit just for auditioning?

  
- Who cares?
- It's always good to get extra credit...

  
... for college...

  
Think LeBron James or Shaquille O'Neal
auditioned for their school musical?

  
- Maybe,
- Troy,

  
The music in those shows isn't hip-hop,
or rock, or anything essential to culture,

  
It's, like, show music,
It's all costumes and makeup...

  
- Oh, dude, it's frightening,
- I know, I thought it'd be a good laugh,

  
- Sharpay's kinda cute, too,
- So is a mountain lion,

  
But you don't pet it,

  
All right, Wildcats! Pair up!

  
Let's go! Come on!

  
(balls bouncing rhythmically)

  
& Coach said to fake right and break left

  
& Watch out for the pick
and keep an eye on defense

  
& Gotta run the give and go
and take the ball to the hole

  
& And don't be afraid
to shoot the outside "J"

  
& Just keep your head in the game
Just keep your head in the game

  
& And don't be afraid
to shoot the outside "J"

  
& Just keep your head in the game
You gotta get your head in the game

  
& We gotta get our, get our, get our,
get our head in the game

  
& You gotta get your,
get your head in the game

  
& We gotta get our, get our, get our,
get our head in the game

  
& Come on, get your,
get your head in the game

  
& We gotta get our, get our, get our,
get our head in the game

  
& You gotta get your,
get your head in the game

  
& We gotta get our, get our, get our,
get our head in the game

  
- & Whoo!
- (whistle blows)

  
& Let's make sure
that we get the rebound

  
& 'Cause when we get it
then the crowd'll go wild

  
& A second chance, gotta grab it and go

  
& Maybe this time we'll hit the right notes

  
& Wait a minute, not the time and place
wait a minute, get my head in the game

  
& Wait a minute
get my head in the game

  
& Wait a minute, wait a minute
I gotta get my, get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your,
get your, get your head in the game

  
& I gotta get my, get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your,
get your, get your head in the game

  
& Come on, get my,
get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your,
get your, get your head in the game

  
& I gotta get my,
get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your, get your,
get your head in the game, whoo

  
& Why am I feeling so wrong?

  
& My head's in the game
but my heart's in the song

  
& She makes this feel so right

  
Should I go for it?

  
I better shake this, Yikes!

  
& I gotta get my,
get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your,
get your, get your head in the game

  
& I gotta get my,
get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your,
get your, get your head in the game

  
& Come on, get my,
get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your,
get your, get your head in the game

  
& I gotta get my,
get my head in the game

  
& You gotta get your, get your,
get your, get your head in the game

  
& Whoo!

  
(players whooping and yelling)

  
- (boy) What team?
- (all) Wildcats!

  
- What team?
- Wildcats!

  
- What team?
- Wildcats!

  
- Wildcats!
- Get your head in the game!

  
(cheering)

  
So, it seemed like you knew Troy Bolton,

  
Not really,
He was just showing me around,

  
(laughs) Well, Troy usually doesn't
interact with new students,

  
- Uh, why not?
- It's pretty much basketball 24/7 with him,

  
- That should be 16 over pi...
- Yes, Miss Montez?

  
I'm sorry, I was just... Uh...

  
Shouldn't the second equation
read 16 over pi?

  
16 over pi? That's quite impossible,

  
I stand corrected,

  
Oh... and welcome aboard,

  
- Catch you later, guys,
- OK,

  
Troy Bolton was looking at our audition list,

  
Again?

  
He was hanging around with that new girl
and they were both looking at the list,

  
There's something freaky about her,
Where did she say she's from?

  
(scoffs)

  
Wow! An Einsteinette,

  
So why do you think she's interested
in our musical?

  
I'm not sure that she is, And we needn't
concern ourselves with amateurs,

  
But... there is no harm in making certain

  
that Gabriella's welcome to
school activities that are...

  
... well, appropriate for her,

  
After all...

  
... she loves pi,

  
Gold! More gold!

  
Paint, paint! Let's go!

  
- The answer is yes!
- Huh?

  
Our scholastic decathlon team
has its first competition next week,

  
and there is certainly a spot for you,

  
- Where did those come from?
- Didn't you put them in my locker?

  
- Of course not,
- Well, we'd love to have you on our team,

  
We meet almost every day after school,

  
Please?

  
I need to catch up on the curriculum here
before I think about joining any clubs,

  
Well, what a perfect way to get caught up,
Meeting with the smartest kids in school,

  
- What a generous offer, Taylor,
- So many new faces in detention today,

  
I hope you don't make a habit of it,

  
but the drama club can always use
an extra hand,

  
And while we are working, let us probe
the mounting evils of cell phones,

  
(whistle blows)

  
Come on, guys, huddle up!
We got two weeks to the big game,

  
Where's Troy and Chad?

  
Don't make me ask again,

  
- Where's Troy and Chad?!
- (all) Detention,

  
(sighs)

  
(whistle blows)

  
Perhaps the most heinous example of
cell-phone abuse is ringing in the theater,

  
What temerity!
The theater is a temple of art,

  
- A precious cornucopia of creative energy,
- Where's my team, Darbus?

  
What the heck are those two
doing in a tree?

  
It's called crime and punishment, Bolton,

  
Besides, proximity to the arts
is cleansing for the soul,

  
Can we have a talk, please?

  
And you two, in the gym, now!

  
If they have to paint sets for detention,
they could do it tonight, not during practice,

  
If these were theater performers,
would you seek special treatment?

  
Darbus, we are days away
from our biggest game of the year,

  
And we, Bolton, are in the midst of our
auditions for our winter musicale as well!

  
This school is about more than
just young men in baggy shorts

  
flinging balls for touchdowns!

  
Baskets! They shoot baskets,

  
Stop! Guys, listen,
you've been having this argument

  
since the day you both started
teaching here,

  
We are one school, one student body,

  
one faculty!
Can we not agree on that?

  
So, Coach, how's the team lookin'?

  
- Troy got 'em whipped into shape?
- Oh!

  
(whistle blows)

  
West High Knights have knocked us out
of the playoffs three years running,

  
and now we are one game away from
taking that championship back from 'em!

  
It's time to make our stand,

  
The team is you,

  
You are the team,
And this team does not exist

  
unless each and every one of you
is fully focused on our goal, Am I clear?

  
- Hey, what team?!
- Wildcats!

  
- What team?
- Wildcats!

  
- What team?
- Wildcats!

  
- Wildcats!
- Get your head in the game!

  
We've never made it past the first round

  
of the scholastic decathlon,
You could be our answered prayer,

  
I'm focusing on my studies this semester,

  
and help my mom get the new house
organized, Maybe next year,

  
- What do you know about Troy Bolton?
- Troy? Hmm,

  
I'm not an expert
on that particular sub-species,

  
however, unless you speak cheerleader,

  
as in, "Oh, my gosh! Isn't Troy Bolton
just the hottie super-bum?"

  
Oh, he's so beautiful,

  
- Ha-ha, See what I mean?
- I don't know how to speak cheerleader,

  
We exist in an alternate
universe to Troy the basketball boy,

  
Have you tried to get to know him?

  
Watch how it works tomorrow
when you have lunch with us,

  
Unless you'd rather sit with the
cheerleaders and discuss firm nail beds,

  
My nail beds are history,

  
Sister!

  
- Still don't understand this detention thing,
- It was my fault,

  
- Sorry, Dad,
- Cross court,

  
Darbus will take any opportunity to
bust my chops, That includes yours too,

  
Hey, Dad?

  
Did you ever want to try something new,
but were afraid of what your friends think?

  
Like, going left? You're doing fine,

  
Well... no,

  
I mean, what if you wanna
try something really new

  
and it's a total disaster
and all your friends laugh at you,

  
Maybe they're not your friends,
That was my whole point about team today,

  
You gotta look out for each other,
You're the leader,

  
There's gonna be college scouts
at our game next week,

  
Know what a scholarship
is worth these days?

  
- A lot,
- Yeah, Focus, Troy, come on,

  
Whoo,

  
Just something for you,

  
(bell ringing)

  
I expect we all learned our homeroom
manners yesterday, people, correct?

  
If not, we have some dressing rooms
that need painting,

  
Now, a few announcements,

  
This morning during free period will be
your chance for the musicale auditions,

  
both single and pairs,

  
I will be in the theater until noon
for those of you bold enough to extend

  
the wingspan of your creative spirit,

  
When's she due back on the mother ship?

  
Discussing the importance
of Shakespeare...

  
- What's up, man?
- What's up?

  
The team's hitting the gym during
free period, What should we run?

  
I can't make it,
I gotta catch up on some homework,

  
What? Hello, it's only the second day back,
I'm not even behind on homework yet,

  
And I've been behind on homework
since preschool,

  
That's hilarious,
I'll catch you later,

  
Homework? There's no way,

  
- How's it going?
- (Troy) Just hanging out?

  
- Good to see you,
- What's he doing?

  
How's it going, man?

  
Short-cut,

  
I'm late for class,

  
(boy) That's good, just leave it here,

  
(overlapping chatter)

  
This is where the true expression
of the artist is realized,

  
Where inner truth is revealed
through the actor's journey...

  
(bell ringing)

  
- Was that a cell phone?
- Is it mine?

  
- No, ma'am, That was the warning bell,
- Ah!

  
Those wishing to audition must
understand that time is of the essence,

  
We have many roles to cast
and final callbacks will be next week,

  
First, you will sing a few bars and I will
give you a sense of whether or not

  
the theater is your calling, Better to hear it
from me now than from your friends later,

  
Our composer, Kelsi Nielson,
will accompany you

  
and be available for rehearsals
prior to callbacks,

  
Shall we?

  
(off-key) & It's hard
to believe that I couldn't see

  
& That you were always right beside me

  
& This feeling like no other

  
& I want you to know

  
Uh-huh, Yes, thank you, Next!

  
(badly off-key)
& It's hard to believe

  
& That I couldn't sneeze... see

  
& That you were always right there
next to beside me

  
Alan, I admire your pluck,

  
- As to your singing...
- &... like no other

  
That's a wonderful tie
you're wearing, Next!

  
(off-key) & It's hard to believe
that I couldn't see

  
& That you were always there beside me

  
& This feeling's like no other

  
& I want you to know

  
Uh... stop,

  
(high-pitched)
&... so lonely before I finally found

  
& What I've been looking...

  
&... for

  
(holding note)

  
Ah... Cindra,

  
What courage to pursue a note that has
not been accessed in the natural world,

  
Bravo! Brava!

  
Perhaps the spring musicale,

  
(crashing)

  
- & It's hard to believe that I could not see
- & Can't see

  
- & That you were right beside me
- & Beside me

  
- & Thought I was alone
- & Alone

  
- & With no one to hold
- & To hold

  
- & But you were right beside me
- & Beside me

  
(Darbus) Well, that was just...

  
... very disturbing,
Go see a counselor, Uhh,

  
Next!

  
Hey!

  
So you decided to sign up for something?

  
- Uh... No, You?
- No,

  
Um... why are you hiding behind a mop?

  
Your friends don't know you're here, right?

  
Right,

  
(& plays intro)

  
Thank you, Next,

  
Miss Darbus is a little... harsh,

  
- The Wildcat superstar's afraid?
- No! I'm not afraid, I...

  
- I'm just... scared,
- Me too... usually,

  
And for the lead roles of Minnie and Arnold
we only have one couple signed up,

  
Sharpay and Ryan,
I think it might be useful for you

  
to give us a sense of why
we gather in this hallowed hall,

  
What key?

  
Oh, we had our rehearsal pianist
do an arrangement,

  
Oh,

  
(whinnies like a horse)

  
Go!

  
& It's hard to believe that I couldn't see

  
(both) & You were always there beside me

  
& Thought I was alone with no one to hold

  
& But you were always right beside me

  
- & This feeling's like no other
- & I want you to know

  
& I've never had someone
that knows me like you do

  
& The way you do

  
& I've never had someone
as good for me as you

  
& No one like you

  
& So lonely before I finally found

  
& What I've been looking for

  
& So good to be seen,
so good to be heard

  
& Don't have to say a word

  
& For so long I was lost,
so good to be found

  
& I'm lovin' having you around

  
& This feeling's like no other

  
& I want you to know

  
& I've never had someone
that knows me like you do

  
& The way you do

  
& I've never had someone
as good for me as you

  
& No one like you

  
& So lonely before I finally found

  
& What I've been looking for

  
& Do-do-do

  
& Do do-do-do do-do

  
& Oh, whoa-oh-oh-oh

  
& Do-do-do-do

  
& Do do-do-do do-do

  
& Oh, whoa-oh-oh-oh

  
I told you not to do the jazz squares,

  
It's a crowd favorite,
Everybody loves a good jazz square,

  
(applause)

  
Well...

  
Are there any last-minute sign-ups?

  
Don't be discouraged, The theater club
needs more than singers, It needs fans too,

  
Buy tickets!

  
Oh, actually,

  
if you do the part with that particular
song, I imagined it much slow...

  
lfwe do the part?

  
Kelsi, my sawed-off Sondheim,
I've been in 17 school productions,

  
How many of your
compositions have been selected?

  
- This would be the first,
- Which tells us what?

  
- That I need to write you more solos?
- No, It tells us that you do not offer

  
direction, suggestion or commentary,
And you should be thankful

  
that me and Ryan can lift
your music out of its obscurity,

  
- Are we clear?
- Yes, ma'am, I mean, Sharpay,

  
Nice talking to you,

  
Any last-minute sign-ups?

  
- We should go,
- No? Good, Done,

  
I'd like to audition, Miss Darbus,

  
Timeliness means something in the world
of theater, young lady,

  
The individual auditions are long over
and there are simply no other pairs,

  
I'll sing with her,

  
Troy Bolton? Where is your sports posse
or whatever it's called?

  
- Team,
- Ah,

  
But I'm here alone,
Actually, I'm here to sing with her,

  
Yes, well, we take these shows very
seriously here at East High,

  
I called for the pairs audition,
and you didn't respond,

  
Free period is now over,

  
- She has an amazing voice,
- Perhaps the next musicale,

  
So, you're a composer?

  
You wrote the song
Ryan and Sharpay just sang?

  
And the entire show?

  
Well, that's really cool,

  
I can't wait to hear the rest of the show,

  
So, why are you so afraid of
Ryan and Sharpay?

  
- I mean, it is your show,
- It is?

  
Isn't the composer of a show kind of
like the playmaker in basketball?

  
Playmaker?

  
The one who makes everyone else
look good,

  
Without you there is no show,
You're the playmaker here, Kelsi,

  
I am?

  
Do you wanna hear how the duet's
supposed to sound?

  
& It's hard to believe that I couldn't see

  
& You were always there beside me

  
& Thought I was alone with no one to hold

  
& But you were always right beside me

  
& This feeling's like no other

  
& I want you to know

  
& That I've never had someone
that knows me like you do

  
& The way you do

  
& And I've never had someone
as good for me as you

  
& No one like you

  
& So lonely before I finally found

  
& What I've been looking for

  
& Ooh-ooh-ooh

  
Wow, That's nice,

  
Bolton, Montez - you have a callback,

  
Kelsi, give them the duet
from the second act,

  
- Work on it with them,
- All right,

  
If you guys wanna rehearse, I'm usually
here during free period and after school,

  
and even sometimes during biology class,
You can come and rehearse anytime,

  
Or come to my house for breakfast,
I have a piano, we can rehearse there,

  
After school, before school - whatever
works, After basketball class...

  
What?

  
(Sharpay) Callback?! Aah!

  
"Callback for roles Arnold and Minnie
next Thursday, 3:30pm,

  
Ryan and Sharpay Evans,
Gabriella Montez and Troy Bolton,"

  
Is this some kind of joke?
They didn't even audition!

  
- Maybe we're being punked?
- What?

  
Maybe we're being filmed right now,
Maybe we'll get to meet Ashton!

  
Oh, shut up, Ryan!

  
What's wrong?

  
(Chad) What?

  
Uhh!

  
How dare she sign up! I picked out
the colors for my dressing room,

  
She hasn't even asked our permission
to join the drama club,

  
- Someone's gotta tell her the rules,
- Exactly,

  
- And what are the rules?
- Ohh!

  
& You can bet there's nothin' but net
when I am in a zone and on a roll

  
& But I got a confession,
my own secret obsession

  
& And it's making me lose control

  
& Everybody gather 'round

  
If Troy can tell his
secret, then I can tell mine,

  
- I bake,
- What?

  
I love to bake! Strudels, scones,
even apple pandowdy,

  
& Not another sound

  
Someday I hope to make
the perfect creme brulee,

  
& No, no, no, no!
No, no, no

  
& Stick to the stuff you know

  
& If you wanna be cool
follow one simple rule

  
& Don't mess with the flow
no, no

  
& Stick to the status quo

  
& Look at me and what do you see?
Intelligence beyond compare

  
& But inside I am stirring,
something strange is occurring

  
& It's a secret I need to share

  
& Open up, dig way down deep

  
Hip-hop is my passion,
I love to pop and lock and jam and break!

  
Is that even legal?

  
& Not another peep!

  
It's just dancing,
I think it's cooler than homework,

  
& No, no, no, no!
No, no, no

  
& Stick to the stuff you know

  
& It is better by far
to keep things as they are

  
& Don't mess with the flow,
no, no

  
& Stick to the status quo

  
& Listen well, I'm ready to tell
about a need that I cannot deny

  
& Dude, there's no explanation
for this awesome sensation

  
& But I'm ready to let it fly

  
& Speak your mind and you'll be heard

  
If Troy wants to be a singer,
then I'm coming clean,

  
- I play the cello!
- Awesome! What is it?

  
- A saw!
- No, dude, it's like, a giant violin!

  
& Not another word

  
- Do you have to wear a costume?
- Coat and tie,

  
& No, no, no, no!
No, no, no

  
& Stick to the stuff you know

  
& If you wanna be cool,
follow one simple rule

  
& Don't mess with the flow,
no, no

  
& Stick to the status quo

  
& No, no, no

  
& Stick to the stuff you know

  
& It is better by far
to keep things as they are

  
& Don't mess with the flow,
no, no

  
& Stick to the status quo

  
& This is not what I want

  
& This is not what I planned

  
& And I just gotta say

  
& I do not understand

  
& Something is really

  
- & Something's not right
- & Really wrong

  
& And we've gotta get things back
where they belong

  
- & We can do it
- & Gotta play

  
- & Stick with what you know
- & We can do it

  
- & Hip-hop hooray
- & She has got to go

  
- & We can do it
- & Creme Brulee

  
& Keep your voice down low

  
- & Not another peep
- & No

  
- & Not another word
- & No

  
- & Not another sound
- & No

  
& Everybody quiet!

  
Why is everybody staring at you?

  
- Not me, you,
- Because of the callbacks?

  
I can't have people staring at me,
I can't,

  
& No! No, no, no

  
& Stick to the stuff you know

  
& If you want to be cool,
follow one simple rule

  
& Don't mess with the flow,
no, no

  
& Stick to the status quo

  
& No, no, no

  
& Stick to the stuff you know

  
& It is better by far
to keep things as they are

  
& Don't mess with the flow,
no, no

  
& Stick to the status
stick to the status

  
& Stick to the status quo

  
(all gasping)

  
(Sharpay) Aah!

  
I am so sorry,

  
You do not want to get into that, man,

  
- Too much drama,
- Yeah,

  
What is going on here?

  
Look at this! That Gabriella girl
just dumped her lunch on me!

  
On purpose! It's all part of their plan to
ruin our musical,

  
And Troy and his basketball robots
are obviously behind it,

  
Why do you think he auditioned?

  
After all the hard work you've
put into this show,

  
It just doesn't seem right,

  
- What's up?
- What's up? Oh, let's see...

  
You missed free-period workout
to audition for a heinous musical,

  
And now suddenly people are confessing,

  
Yeah, and Zeke,
Zeke is baking... creme brulee,

  
What's that?

  
Oh, a creamy custard
with a caramelized surface,

  
- It's really satisfying,
- Shut up, Zeke!

  
Look... do you see
what's happening here, man?

  
Our team is coming apart
because of your singing thing,

  
Even the drama geeks and
the brainiacs suddenly think that they can...

  
... talk to us,

  
- Look, the skater dudes are mingling,
- Yo!

  
Suddenly people think that they
can do other stuff,

  
Stuff that's not their stuff,

  
You're thinking about show tunes,
when we've got a playoff game next week,

  
Whoa!

  
Whoa!

  
- Ooh!
- (boy) Head's up!

  
- All right, Cards on the table right now,
- Huh?

  
You're tweaked because I put your stars
in detention and now you're getting even,

  
What are you talking about, Darbus?

  
Your all-star son
turned up at my audition,

  
Now, I give every student an even chance,

  
which is a long and honorable
tradition in the theater,

  
Something that you wouldn't understand,

  
But, if he is planning some sort of practical
joke in my chapel of the arts...

  
- Troy doesn't even sing,
- Oh, well, you're wrong about that,

  
But I will not allow my Twinkle Town
musicale to be made into farce,

  
- Twinkle Town?
- See? I knew it!

  
- Hey...
- I knew it!

  
Sounds like a winner,
Good luck on Broadway!

  
Is Sharpay really, really mad at me?
I said I was sorry,

  
Look, no one has beaten out Sharpay for
a musical since kindergarten,

  
I wasn't trying to beat anyone out,

  
We didn't even audition,
we were just singing,

  
You won't convince Sharpay of that,

  
If that girl could play both Romeo and
Juliet, her own brother would be aced out,

  
I told you it just happened, but I liked it,

  
A lot,

  
Did you ever feel like there's
a whole other person inside you

  
just looking for a way to come out?

  
Not really, No,

  
(bell ringing)

  
Let's go,

  
Hey, Sharpay, I thought since Troy Bolton's
gonna be in your show...

  
Troy Bolton is not in my show,

  
OK, um... well, I thought maybe
you could watch me play ball sometime,

  
- I'd rather stick pins in my eyes,
- Wouldn't that be awfully uncomfortable?

  
Evaporate, tall person!

  
I bake!

  
If that helps,

  
- Wow! It's like a jungle up here,
- Yeah, just like that cafeteria,

  
Well, I just humiliated myself into
the next century,

  
- No! Come on,
- So this is your private hideout?

  
Yeah, Thanks to the science club, Which
means my buddies don't know it exists,

  
You pretty much have the school wired,
don't you, Troy?

  
Seems to me like everyone on campus
wants to be your friend,

  
Unless we lose,

  
Well, I'm sure it's tricky
being the coach's son,

  
Makes me practice a little harder,
I guess,

  
I don't know what he'll say
about the singing,

  
- You worried?
- My parents friends are always saying,

  
"Your son's the basketball guy,
You must be so proud,"

  
Sometimes I don't wanna be
the "basketball guy."

  
I just wanna be a guy, You know?

  
I saw the way you treated Kelsi at
the audition yesterday,

  
Do your friends know that guy?

  
To them, I'm the playmaker dude,

  
They don't know enough
about you, Troy,

  
At my other schools I was
the freaky math girl,

  
It's cool coming here and being...
anyone I wanna be,

  
When I was singing with you
I just felt like... a girl,

  
You even look like one, too,

  
Remember in kindergarten how you'd meet
a kid and know nothing about them,

  
then ten seconds later you play
like you're best friends

  
because you didn't have to
be anything but yourself,

  
- Yeah,
- Singing with you felt like that,

  
Well, uh... I never thought about singing,
That's for sure,

  
Till you,

  
So you really wanna do the callbacks?

  
Hey, just call me freaky callback boy,

  
You're a cool guy, Troy,

  
But not for the reasons your friends think,

  
And thanks for showing me
your top-secret hiding place,

  
Like kindergarten,

  
(bell ringing)

  
(both sigh)

  
& We're soarin', we're flyin'...

  
(Troy singing)

  
& Breaking...

  
& Creating space between us...

  
& There's not a star in heaven that we...

  
& Flyin'

  
& There's not a star in heaven that we...

  
(whistle blows)

  
Let's go, guys! Make it sharp!
To the chest, come on! Pop it!

  
Come on, guys, Step with it!
Let's go!

  
Come on, move it! Let's go!

  
Come on, guys, focus! Focus!
Get your head in the game!

  
Move it!

  
- You seen Troy?
- No... Coach,

  
(blows whistle) Again, let's go!

  
(whistle blows)

  
That's it, guys, Let's hit the showers,
Good hustle, Let's see that in the game,

  
I, uh,, think I'm gonna stay a while,
Work on some free throws,

  
Since you missed practice, I think your
team deserves a little effort from you today,

  
Wow, So this is your real stage,

  
Yeah, I guess you could call it that,

  
Or just a smelly gym,

  
Whoa!

  
Don't tell me you're good at hoops, too,

  
You know, I once scored 41 points
at a league championship game,

  
- No way,
- Mm-hm, And the same day,

  
I invented the space shuttle
and microwave popcorn,

  
Oh! Microwave popcorn, Ha-ha, Funny,

  
- I've been rehearsing with Kelsi,
- Me, too, And, by the way,

  
I missed practice, So if I get kicked off
the team it'll be on your conscience,

  
- Hey, I wasn't the one who told you...
- Gabriella, chill,

  
Hey, that's traveling,
No, that's really bad traveling,

  
(laughing)

  
Miss! I'm sorry, this is a closed practice,

  
- Dad, practice is over,
- Not till the last player leaves,

  
- Team rule,
- Oh, I'm sorry, sir,

  
- Dad, this is Gabriella Montez,
- Ah, your detention buddy,

  
I'll see you later, Troy,

  
Nice meeting you, Coach Bolton,

  
You as well, Miss Montez,

  
Dad, detention was my fault,
not hers,

  
You haven't missed practice in three years,
That girl shows up...

  
That girl is named Gabriella,
She's very nice,

  
Helping you miss practice doesn't
make her very nice, Not in my book,

  
- Or your team's,
- Dad, she's not a problem,

  
- She's just a girl,
- But you're not just a guy, Troy,

  
You're the team leader,

  
What you do effects not only this team,
but the entire school,

  
And without you completely focused,
we're not gonna win next week,

  
The championship games -
they don't come along all the time,

  
- They're something special,
- Yeah, a lot of things are special, Dad,

  
But you're a playmaker...
not a singer, right?

  
Did you ever think maybe I could be both?

  
- What?
- Let's go,

  
What spell has this elevated-IQ
temptress girl cast

  
that suddenly makes you wanna be
in musical?

  
Look, I just did it, Who cares?

  
Who cares? How about your most
loyal best friend?

  
- Quiet in here, Mr, Danforth,
- It's him, Miss Falsaff, not me,

  
Look, you're a hoops dude,
not a musical singer person,

  
Have you seen Michael Crawford
on a cereal box?

  
- Who's Michael Crawford?
- Exactly my point,

  
He was the Phantom of the Opera
on Broadway,

  
Now my mom, she's seen
that musical 27 times,

  
and put Michael Crawford's picture
in our refrigerator,

  
Yeah, not on it, in it,

  
So my point is, if you play basketball,
you're gonna end up on the cereal box,

  
If you're in musicals, you'll
end up in my mom's refrigerator,

  
Why in her refrigerator?

  
One of her crazy diet ideas, I won't
attempt to understand the female mind,

  
It's foreign territory,

  
How can you expect the rest of us to be
focused on a game if you're off somewhere

  
in leotards singing "Twinkle Town"?

  
No one said anything about leotards,

  
Not yet, my friend, but just you wait,

  
Look, we need you, Captain,
Big time,

  
- Mr, Danforth,
- I tried to tell him, Miss Falsaff,

  
Really tried,

  
Something isn't right,

  
- Hey, look, We need to talk,
- Go,

  
They must be trying to figure out a way to
make sure Troy and Gabriella beat us out,

  
The jocks rule most of the school,
but if they get Troy into a musical,

  
then they've conquered
the entire student body,

  
And if those science girls get Gabriella
hooked up with Troy Bolton,

  
the scholastic club goes from drool to cool,

  
Ryan, we need to save our show from
people who don't know the difference

  
between a Tony Award and Tony Hawk,

  
Do you think that'll work?

  
It's the only way to save Troy and Gabriella
from themselves,

  
- So we on?
- Yeah,

  
- Good, So we start tomorrow then,
- OK, the first thing,

  
- Nice, Let's go,
- Cool,

  
(bell ringing)

  
So, my watch is 7:45 Mountain Standard
time, We synched?

  
- Whatever,
- Then we're on go mode for lunch, 12:05,

  
Yes, Chad, we're a go,
But we're not Charlie's Angels, OK?

  
I can dream, can't I?

  
(bell ringing)

  
"Spider" Bill Netrine,
class of '72,

  
He was the MVP in the league
championship game,

  
Sam Nedler, class of '02,
Also known as "Sammy Slamma Jamma."

  
Captain, MVP of the league
championship team,

  
The "Thunder Clap," Hap Hadden, '95,

  
Led the Wildcats to
back-to-back city championships,

  
- A legend,
- Yes, Legends, one and all,

  
But do you think that any of these Wildcat
legends became legends

  
by getting involved in musical auditions
days before the league championships?

  
- Get your head in the game!
- No,

  
These Wildcat legends became legends

  
because they never took
their eye off the prize,

  
Get your head in the game!

  
Who was the first sophomore ever
to make starting varsity?

  
- Troy!
- Who voted him team captain this year?

  
- Us!
- And who is gonna get their butts kicked

  
in Friday's championship game if Troy's
worried about an audition?

  
- We are,
- Guys, come on,

  
There's 12 people on this team,
not just me,

  
Just 12? Oh, no,

  
I think you're forgetting about one very
important 13th member of our squad,

  
- My dad,
- Yes, Troy,

  
Wildcat basketball champion,
class of 1981,

  
Champion, father, and now coach,

  
It's a winning tradition like no other,

  
From lowly Neanderthal and Cro-Magnon,
to early warriors, medieval knights,

  
All leading up to...

  
... lunkhead basketball man,

  
Yes, our culture worshiped the aggressor
throughout the ages

  
and we end up with spoiled, overpaid
bonehead athletes

  
who contribute little to civilization other
than slam dunks and touchdowns,

  
That is the inevitable world
of Troy Bolton,

  
But the path of the mind,
the path we're on,

  
ours is the path that
has brought us these people:

  
Eleanor Roosevelt, Frida Kahlo,
Sandra Day O'Connor,

  
Madame Curie, Jane Goodall,
Oprah Winfrey

  
and so many others
who the world reveres,

  
Uh, but, what is...?
I've got Kelsi waiting for me to rehearse,

  
Gabriella!

  
Troy Bolton represents one side
of evolution,

  
And our side, the side of education
and accomplishment

  
is the future of civilization!

  
This is the side where you belong,

  
Guys, if you don't know that I'll put
a 110% of my guts into that game,

  
then you don't know me,

  
- But we just thought...
- I'll tell you what I thought,

  
I thought that you're my friends,
Win together, lose together, teammates,

  
- But suddenly the girl... and the singing,
- Man, I'm for the team!

  
I've always been for the team,
She's just someone I met,

  
All right the singing thing is nothing.
A way to keep my nerves down.

  
It means nothing to me.
You're my guys and this is our team.

  
Gabriella is not important.

  
I'll forget about her, forget the audition
and we'll get that championship.

  
Everyone happy now?

  
Behold lunkhead basketball man,

  
So, Gabriella, we'd love to have you
for the scholastic decathlon,

  
Did you wanna grab some lunch?

  
Well, we'll be there if you wanna come,

  
- Wildcats!
- Get your head in the game!

  
Whoo!

  
- Let's go!
- (girl) Go, Wildcats!

  
& Everybody sing out

  
& Wildcats everywhere
wave your hands up in the air

  
& That's the way we do it
let's get to it, time to show the world

  
& Wildcats, sing along,
they really got it going on

  
& Wildcats in the house
everybody sing out

  
& Wildcats everywhere,
wave your hands up in the air...

  
(team) Troy, Troy, Troy...

  
& It's funny when you find yourself

  
& Looking from the outside

  
& I'm standing here but all I want
is to be over there

  
& Why did I let myself believe

  
& Miracles could happen?

  
& 'Cause now I have to pretend
that I don't really care

  
& I thought you were my fairy tale

  
& A dream when I'm not sleeping

  
& A wish upon a star that's coming true

  
& But everybody else could tell

  
& That I confused my feelings with the truth

  
& When there was me and you

  
& I swore I knew the melody
that I heard you singing

  
& And when you smiled you made me feel
like I could sing along

  
& But then you went
and changed the words

  
& Now my heart is empty

  
& I'm only left with used-to-bes
and once upon a song

  
& Now I know your not a fairy tale

  
& And dreams were meant for sleeping

  
& And wishes on a star
just don't come true

  
& 'Cause now even I can tell

  
& That I confused my feelings with the truth

  
& 'Cause I liked the view

  
& When there was me and you

  
& I can't believe
that I could be so blind

  
& It's like you were floating
while I was falling

  
& And I didn't mind

  
& Because I liked the view, ooh
ooh, ooh, ooh

  
& I thought you felt it too

  
& When there was me and you

  
(students chattering)

  
Hey, how you doin'?

  
I wanna talk to you about something,

  
And here it is: I know what it's like
to carry a load with your friends,

  
I get it, You've got your boys, Troy,
It's OK, So we're good,

  
Good about what?
I wanna talk about the final callbacks,

  
I don't wanna do the callbacks either,

  
Who are we trying to kid?
You've got your team and I've got mine,

  
I'll do the scholastic decathlon
and you'll win the championships,

  
It's where we belong,

  
- Go, Wildcats,
- But I...

  
Me neither,

  
(horn blows)

  
Gabriella?

  
(horn)

  
Go Wildcats!

  
Hey, Captain!

  
- What's with Troy?
- Don't worry about it,

  
(grunting)

  
(frustrated grunt)

  
Oh, hey!

  
- Troy! Hey,
- Hey, Troy!

  
Hey, um...

  
We just had another team meeting,

  
Oh... wonderful,

  
We had a team meeting about how
we haven't been acting like a team,

  
I mean us, not you,

  
- About the singing thing...
- I don't even wanna talk about it,

  
We just want you to know
that we're gonna be there,

  
- Cheering for you,
- Huh?

  
If singing is what you wanna do,

  
we should boost you up,
not tear you down,

  
Yeah, Win or lose, we're teammates,

  
That's what we're about, Even if you turn
out to be the worst singer in the world,

  
Which we don't know, because we
haven't heard you sing,

  
You're not gonna hear me sing, guys,

  
Because Gabriella won't even talk to me...

  
... and I don't know why,

  
We do,

  
I baked these fresh today,

  
You'll probably want to try one
before we tell you the rest,

  
Gabriella, we were jerks,

  
No, we were worse than jerks
because we were mean jerks,

  
We thought Troy
and the whole singing thing was

  
killing our chances of having you
on the scholastic decathlon team,

  
I heard what he had to say,
I'm on your team now, Done,

  
No, not done,

  
We knew that Chad could get
Troy to say things

  
to make you want to
forget about the callbacks,

  
We planned it,
and we're embarrassed and sorry,

  
No one forced Troy to say anything,
And you know what? It's OK,

  
We should prepare for the decathlon,
it's time to move on,

  
No, it's not OK,

  
The decathlon is whatever, but how you
feel about us, and even more, Troy -

  
- that's what really matters,

  
(whispers) We tried,

  
(dog barking)

  
Hi, uh... Just came to say I'm sorry,

  
- Hi, Miss Montez, I'm Troy Bolton,
- Oh, Troy!

  
(mouths) No,

  
Um... Gabriella is kind of busy with
homework, so now's not a good time,

  
I made a mistake, Miss Montez, and I
would really like to let Gabriella know that,

  
- Could you tell her I came by to see her?
- I will... Troy,

  
- Good night,
- Good night, Thank you,

  
(phone beeping)

  
(phone ringing in receiver)

  
(phone ringing)

  
- Hello?
- What you heard, none of that is true,

  
I was sick of my friends riding me,
so I said things to shut them up,

  
I didn't mean any of it,

  
You sounded pretty convincing to me.

  
The guy you met on vacation is more me
than the guy who said those stupid things,

  
The whole singing thing
is making the school whack,

  
You said so yourself, Everyone's
treating you differently because of it,

  
Maybe because I don't wanna
only be the basketball guy.

  
They can't handle it.
That's not my problem, it's theirs.

  
- How about your dad?
- And it's not about my dad.

  
This is about how I feel,
and I'm not letting the team down.

  
They let me down.

  
So I'm gonna sing. What about you?

  
- I don't know, Troy,
- Well, you need to say yes.

  
Because I brought you something.

  
What do you mean?

  
Turn around.

  
& This could be the start of something new

  
& It feels so right to be here with you

  
& Oh

  
& And now lookin' in your eyes

  
& I feel in my heart

  
& The start of something...

  
... new

  
It's a pairs audition,

  
(whistle blows, players yelling)

  
Whoo,

  
Yeah!

  
Zn4, and by doing that,
you end up with two...

  
... and two, Got it?

  
Yes!

  
What's happening?

  
Come here, Go ahead
and put five grams of this in,

  
and that causes it to change
from an acidic state,

  
Causing the color to change from
pink to blue,

  
Just like those pH strips,

  
Oh, gotta go, See you guys later!

  
Whoa!

  
You're late!

  
(both) &... strength to believe

  
& We're soarin'

  
& Flyin'

  
& There's not a star in heaven
that we can't reach

  
& Bop bop bop...

  
(Troy) & If we're tryin'

  
(both) & Yeah, we're breakin' free

  
(gasps)

  
Wow, They sound good,

  
(scoffs)

  
& Like a wave the ocean just...

  
We have to do something,

  
OK, our callbacks on Thursday

  
and the basketball game
and scholastic decathlon are on Friday,

  
Too bad all these events weren't
happening on the same day...

  
... at the same time,

  
That wouldn't work out because then Troy
and Gabriella wouldn't be able to make...

  
I'm proud to call you my sister,

  
I know,

  
(Darbus) I don't want to hear any more
about Troy and that Montez girl,

  
So, if you're telling me as co-presidents of
the drama club that changing the callbacks

  
would be what's best for our theater
program, I might actually agree with you,

  
Is that a yes?

  
& Bop bop bop, up to the top

  
& And wipe away your inhibitions

  
& Stomp, stomp, stomp
do the romp and strut your stuff

  
& Bop bop bop, straight to the top...

  
(Chad) No problem at all,
It was crazy, man,

  
Callbacks the same time as the game?

  
- And the scholastic decathlon,
- Why would they do that?

  
- I smell a rat named Darbus,
- I think two rats, neither named Darbus,

  
Do you know something about this,
small person?

  
Miss Darbus thinks
she's protecting the show,

  
but Ryan and Sharpay are
only concerned with protecting themselves,

  
Do you know what I'll do to
those two show dogs?

  
Nothing, We're not gonna do
anything to them,

  
Except to sing, maybe,

  
Now this is only gonna happen if
we all work together,

  
- Now who's in?
- You know I'm in,

  
(classroom chatter)

  
- A pi pie,
- (gasps)

  
- Oh, my goodness!
- Oh, my gosh!

  
What? Thank you!

  
- Oh, we have something for you too,
- Yeah, come here, look,

  
(both) Ta-da!

  
Oh... it's an equation,

  
Oh!

  
That's awful!

  
Stay right there, Watch,

  
From our team, to yours,

  
G - O - D - R - A - M - A- C- L - U - B

  
Exclamation point,

  
Well, seems we Wildcats are in for
an interesting afternoon,

  
Go,

  
G-O-D... dra,, Go dra... Go dray...

  
- Ugh!
- Drame?

  
(bell ringing, students yelling)

  
(rhythmic clapping)

  
How you feeling?

  
- Nervous,
- Yeah, me too,

  
- Wish I could suit up and play with you,
- Hey, you had your turn,

  
You know what I want from you today?

  
- The championship,
- Well, that'll come or it won't,

  
What I want is for you to have fun,

  
I know all about the pressure,
Probably too much of it has come from me,

  
What I really want is to see my son
having the time of his life

  
playing the game we both love,

  
You give me that, and I will sleep with a
smile on my face no matter what the score,

  
Thanks, Coach... uh...

  
... Dad,

  
(cheering, drummers drumming)

  
(announcer) Welcome to
the tenth annual Scholastic Decathlon.

  
The East High Wildcats
versus the West High Knights.

  
Hello! Right here, right here,

  
(vocal gibberish)

  
- Mah, mah, mah!
- Mah, mah, mah!

  
- Eeh! Eeh!
- Ow! Ow!

  
Stop!

  
- I trust you,
- Energy,

  
- (all) Whoo!
- Come on, let's do it,

  
(announcer) And now introducing
your East High Wildcats!

  
Let's go! Go!

  
...for this championship game
between East High and West High!

  
Casting the leads of a show is both
a challenge and a responsibility,

  
A joy and a burden,

  
I commend you and all other
young artists to hold out

  
for the moon, the sun and the stars,

  
Shall we soar together?

  
Sharpay and Ryan!

  
Mucho gusto!

  
Ay, que fabulosa!

  
(trills tongue) Ay! Ay! Ay!

  
- Arriba!
- Quien es bailar?

  
& Me la me

  
& I believe in dreamin',
shootin' for the stars

  
& Baby to be number one
you've got to raise the bar

  
& Kickin' and a scratchin',
grindin' out my best

  
& Anything it takes to climb
the ladder of success

  
(both) & Work our tails off every day

  
& Gotta bump the competition
blow them all away

  
- & Caliente!
- & Suave!

  
& Yeah we're gonna

  
& Bop, bop, bop
bop to the top

  
& Slip and slide and ride
that rhythm

  
& Jump and hop
hop till we drop

  
& And start again

  
& Zip zap zop
pop like a mop

  
& Scoot around the corner

  
& Move it to the groove
till the music stops

  
& Do the bop bop,
bop to the top

  
& Don't ever stop
bop to the top

  
& Gimme, gimme, shimmy, shimmy

  
Wildcats!

  
(announcer)... the coveted
championship trophy!

  
(cheerleaders cheering in background)

  
(blows whistle)

  
East High wins the opening tip,
pushing the ball up the court.

  
(ding)

  
(man) East High,

  
We did it!

  
Great job!

  
& Shake some booty and turn around

  
& Flash a smile in their direction

  
& Show some muscle

  
& Do the Hustle

  
All right, Wildcats, time for
an orderly exit from the gym,

  
(buzzing)

  
And West High pushes the ball around
the perimeter on the offensive end.

  
Nice ball movement by West High.

  
Driving the lane...

  
shot is up and...

  
(buzzer sounds)

  
We seem to be experiencing
some technical difficulties,

  
(whistle)

  
We've got a timeout on the court here.

  
We have a problem,
Stop the game, Stop the game,

  
Referee has signaled timeout.

  
Everyone please remain calm.

  
Go, go, go, go,

  
We'll get this figured out real soon,
In the meantime, per safety regulations,

  
we need to all make an orderly exit
from the gym, please,

  
Thank you,

  
(both) & Yeah, we're gonna
bop, bop, bop

  
- & Bop to the top
- & Wipe away your inhibitions

  
& Stump, stump, stump
do the romp

  
& And strut your stuff

  
& Bop, bop, bop
straight to the top

  
& Going for the glory

  
& We'll keep stepping up
and we just won't stop, stop

  
& Till we reach the top

  
& Bop to the top

  
(applause)

  
Oh, hi! Call me,

  
Do you see why we love the theater,
people? Well done!

  
Ah, Troy Bolton, Gabriella Montez,

  
Troy? Gabriella?

  
- They'll be here,
- The theater, as I have often pointed out,

  
waits for no one, I'm sorry,

  
Well, we are done here,

  
Congratulations to all,
The cast list will be posted,

  
Wait! Miss Darbus, wait!

  
- We're ready, we can sing,
- I called your names, twice,

  
- Miss Darbus, please! Please!
- Rules are rules!

  
(students murmur)

  
We'll be happy to do it again
for our fellow students,

  
I don't know what's going on here,
but in any event,

  
it's far too late
and we have not got a pianist,

  
- Well, that's show biz,
- We'll sing without a piano,

  
Oh, no, you won't,
Pianist here, Miss Darbus,

  
- You really don't wanna do that,
- Oh, yes, I really do,

  
Ready on stage,

  
Now that's show biz,

  
(Kelsi plays intro)

  
I can't do it, Troy,
not with all these people staring at me,

  
Hey, hey, look at me, right at me,

  
Right at me, Like the first time
we sang together, Remember?

  
Like kindergarten,

  
& We're soarin', flyin'

  
& There's not a star in heaven
that we can't reach

  
& If we're trying so we're breaking free

  
& You know the world can see us

  
& In a way that's different than who we are

  
& Creating space between us
till we're separate hearts

  
& But your faith it gives me strength
strength to believe

  
- & We're breakin' free
- & We're soarin'

  
& Flyin'

  
& There's not a star
in heaven that we can't reach

  
& If we're tryin'

  
& Yeah, we're breakin' free

  
- & Oh, we're breakin' free
- & Oh

  
& Can you feel it building

  
& Like a wave the ocean just can't control

  
& Connected by a feeling
Ooh, in our very soul

  
& Very soul, ooh

  
& Rising till it lifts us up
so everyone can see

  
& We're breakin' free

  
- & We're soarin'
- & Flyin'

  
& There's not a star in heaven
that we can't reach

  
- & If we're trying
- & Yeah, we're breaking free

  
- & Oh, we're breakin' free
- & Ooh!

  
- & Runnin'
- & Climbin'

  
& To get to that place
to be all that we can be

  
& Now's the time

  
& So we're breaking free

  
- & We're breaking free
- & Ooh, yeah

  
& More than hope, more than faith
& This is true, this is fate

  
& And together we see it comin'

  
& More than you, more than me
& Not a want, but a need

  
& Both of us breakin' free

  
- & Soarin'
- & Flyin'

  
& There's not a star in
heaven that we can't reach

  
& If we're tryin'

  
& Yeah, we're breaking free

  
& Breaking free

  
- & We're runnin'
- & Ooh, climbin'

  
& To get to the place
to be all that we can be

  
- & Now's the time
- & Now's the time

  
& We're breaking free
& Oh, we're breaking free

  
& Oh

  
& You know the world can see us

  
& In a way that's different than who we are

  
(applause and cheering)

  
Whoo!

  
- (boy) That's amazing!
- (girl) Amazing, yeah!

  
(announcer) And West High
pushin' the ball.

  
Fast break.
Looking for an open man.

  
Oh, but it's stolen by number heading back the other way!

  
East High has the ball!
Time is running down on the clock!

  
Looking for an open man.

  
Fake. Swing to the outside.
Ball on the perimeter.

  
Looks for a man on the inside.
Nice screen.

  
Shot's up! And it's good!

  
A 12-foot jump shot
as time expires for the victory!

  
East High has won the championship!
Your East High Wildcats are champions!

  
Congratulations, East High!

  
(crowd chants) Troy! Troy! Troy!

  
- Congratulations,
- Thanks,

  
Coming through! Coming through!
Coming through!

  
- (player) What team?
- (all) Wildcats!

  
- What team?
- Wildcats!

  
- What team?
- Wildcats!

  
- Wildcats!
- Get your head in the game!

  
Oh, yeah, bro!

  
- I'm proud of you, son!
- Aw, thanks, Dad!

  
- Bravo!
- Brava!

  
- (boy) Troy, you're the man!
- No, you!

  
- Congratulations, Wildcat!
- What about your team?

  
We won too!

  
Yo! Team voted you the game ball,
Captain!

  
Yeah, thank you, Thanks a lot,

  
So... you're going with me to
the after-party, right?

  
- Like on a date?
- Must be your lucky day,

  
Chad just asked me out,

  
Well, congratulations,

  
I'll be the understudy
in case you can't make a show, so...

  
... break a leg,

  
In theater that means good luck,

  
Hey, Sharpay, I'm sorry you didn't get
the lead, but I think you're really good,

  
- I admire you so much,
- And, why wouldn't you? Now, bye-bye,

  
- Wait, I baked you some cookies,
- Ew,

  
- Nice game,
- Thanks,

  
Composer, here's your game ball,
You deserve it, playmaker,

  
- (all cheer)
- Yeah!

  
Whoo, that's what I'm talkin' about,

  
Here we go!

  
& Together, together,
together everyone

  
& Together, together,
come on, let's have some fun

  
& Together, were there for
each other every time

  
& Together, together
come on, let's do this right

  
& Here and now it's time for celebration

  
& I finally figured out

  
& Yeah, yeah

  
& That all our dreams
have no limitations

  
- & That's what it's all about
- & Come on, now

  
& Everyone is special in their own way

  
- & We make each other strong
- (both) & Each other strong

  
& Were not the same,
we're different in a good way

  
& Together's where we belong

  
& We're all in this together

  
& Once we know that we are
we're all stars and we see that

  
& We're all in this together

  
& And it shows when we stand
hand in hand

  
& Make our dreams come true

  
& Everybody now

  
& Together, together
together, everyone

  
& Together, together
come on, let's have some fun

  
& Together, we're there
for each other every time

  
& Together, together
come on, let's do this right

  
& We're all here and speaking out
with one voice

  
& We're gonna rock the house, yeah, yeah

  
& The party's on,
now everybody make some noise

  
& Come on, scream and shout

  
& We've arrived because we stuck together

  
& Champions one and all

  
& We're all in this together

  
& Once we know that we are
we're all stars

  
& And we see that
we're all in this together

  
& And it shows when we stand
hand in hand

  
& Make our dreams come

  
& We're all in this together

  
& When we reach, we can fly
know inside

  
& We can make it

  
& We're all in his together

  
& Once we see there's a chance
that we have and we take it

  
& Wildcats sing along

  
& Yeah, you really got it goin' on

  
& Wildcats in the house

  
& Everybody say it now

  
& Wildcats everywhere
wave your hands up in the air

  
& That's the way we do it
let's get to it

  
& Time to show the world

  
Hey!

  
Ho!

  
Hey! Ho!
All right, here we go!

  
& We're all in this together

  
& Once we know that we are
we're all stars and we see that

  
& We're all in this together

  
& And it shows when we stand
hand in hand

  
& Make our dreams come true

  
& We're all in this together

  
& When we reach, we can fly
know inside we can make it

  
& We're all in this together

  
& Once we see there's a chance
that we have and we take it

  
& Wildcats everywhere
wave your hands up in the air

  
& That's the way we do it
let's get to it

  
& Come on, everyone!

  
- Yeah!
- (giggles)

  
Whoo,

  
Whoo!

  
Yeah! Go,

  
(boy) Whoo,

  
& Wildcats sing along

  
& They really got it goin' on

  
& Wildcats in the house

  
& Everybody sing out

  
& Wildcats everywhere,
wave your hands up in the air

  
& That's the way we do it,
let's get to it

  
& Time to show the world

  
& Wildcats sing along

  
& Yeah, you really got it goin' on

  
& Wildcats in the house

  
& Everybody say it now

  
& Wildcats everywhere,
wave your hands up in the air

  
& That's the way we do it,
let's get to it

  
& Time to show...

  
(panting)

  
These cookies are genius!

  
The best things I've ever tasted!

  
Will you make some more for me, Zeke?

  
I might even make you a creme brulee,

Welcome! Are you completely new to programming? If not then we presume you will be looking for information about why and how to get started with Python. Fortunately an experienced programmer in any programming language (whatever it may be) can pick up Python very quickly. It's also easy for beginners to use and learn, so jump in!

Installing
Installing Python is generally easy, and nowadays many Linux and UNIX distributions include a recent Python. Even some Windows computers (notably those from HP) now come with Python already installed. If you do need to install Python and aren't confident about the task you can find a few notes on the BeginnersGuide/Download wiki page, but installation is unremarkable on most platforms.

Learning
Before getting started, you may want to find out which IDEs and text editors are tailored to make Python editing easy, browse the list of introductory books, or look at code samples that you might find helpful.

There is a list of tutorials suitable for experienced programmers on the BeginnersGuide/Tutorials page. There is also a list of resources in other languages which might be useful if English is not your first language.

The online documentation is your first port of call for definitive information. There is a fairly brief tutorial that gives you basic information about the language and gets you started. You can follow this by looking at the library reference for a full description of Python's many libraries and the language reference for a complete (though somewhat dry) explanation of Python's syntax. If you are looking for common Python recipes and patterns, you can browse the ActiveState Python Cookbook

Looking for Something Specific?
If you want to know whether a particular application, or a library with particular functionality, is available in Python there are a number of possible sources of information. The Python web site provides a Python Package Index (also known as the Cheese Shop, a reference to the Monty Python script of that name). There is also a search page for a number of sources of Python-related information. Failing that, just Google for a phrase including the word ''python'' and you may well get the result you need. If all else fails, ask on the python newsgroup and there's a good chance someone will put you on the right track.

Frequently Asked Questions
If you have a question, it's a good idea to try the FAQ, which answers the most commonly asked questions about Python.

Looking to Help?
If you want to help to develop Python, take a look at the developer area for further information. Please note that you don't have to be an expert programmer to help. The documentation is just as important as the compiler, and still needs plenty of work!


